 During Lane’s tenure as chairman, Hewlett-Packard wrestled with missed sales forecasts, an ill-fated decision to explore a spinoff of the personal computer division and a disastrous acquisition of software maker Autonomy Corp.
 Together with Apotheker, who was forced out in September 2011, Lane oversaw the company’s $103 billion acquisition of Autonomy, which resulted in an $88 billion writedown and investigations of accounting fraud.
 Tapering will continue to weigh on emerging markets” Brazil’s Ibovespa fell for the fourth time in five days as Itau Unibanco Holding SA slumped after announcing the acquisition of Corpbanca SA in Chile.
 remains interested in a potential acquisition of Europe’s biggest mobile-phone operator.
 on its $159 billion acquisition of US.
 Surprise Leaders BT’s acquisition of rights for this season’s Premier League, the top soccer competition in England, means BSkyB customers are missing out on some Arsenal games.
 The firm said earnings would also include a higher-than-expected effective tax rate, increased severance and other operating expenses following consolidation and a $5 million expense related to the firm’s acquisition of fund-of-hedge-funds unit Fauchier Partners, according to the statement.
 can’t for now rely on an insurer to pay $20 million to help settle shareholder claims over the software maker’s acquisition of a company controlled by Oracle founder Larry Ellison, a judge concluded.
 Justice Department won a lawsuit challenging online product review software maker Bazaarvoice Inc’s $168 million acquisition of PowerReviews Inc, its biggest competitor.
 Oi SA’s acquisition of Portugal Telecom SGPS SA, a $143 billion deal announced in October, was the biggest of 2013, followed by the $831 billion concession to develop and maintain Galeao airport at Rio de Janeiro city, won by a consortium led by Odebrecht SA and Changi Airport Group Singapore Pte Ltd.
 He cited Pearson Plc’s acquisition of Grupo Multi, the owner of English schools including Wizard, Yazigi, Microlins and Skill, for $505 million plus 250 million reais in debt, a deal that was announced on Dec.
 remains interested in a potential acquisition of Europe’s largest mobile-phone operator, even after giving up the option to bid for six months, according to people familiar with the situation.
 maker of memory chips, reported fiscal first-quarter revenue that topped analysts’ estimates after the acquisition of Elpida Memory Inc.
 KKR’s debt business is poised to expand further with the acquisition of Avoca Capital, a European credit-investment manager with about $8 billion of assets.
 Sysco said the acquisition of Rosemont, Illinois-based US Foods will boost its share of the US.
 for $15 billion, the first acquisition of a Hong Kong lender since 2009.
 Google Inc’s $32 billion acquisition of the digital-thermostat maker is also making venture-capital firms very comfortable.
 Big Gains The gain on the Nest investment is one of the largest to date for Shasta Ventures, whose other payoffs have included Intuit Inc’s acquisition of Mint in 2009 and Citrix System Inc’s purchase of Zenprise.
 The acquisition of Nest, almost double what Google paid for YouTube in 2006, also provides the biggest payback to date for the search provider’s own venture-capital arm.
 “We are excited to move forward with our acquisition of Celesio,” said John H.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Liberty Global Plc is putting the final touches on an acquisition of Dutch broadband provider Ziggo NV as the cable company expands its European operations, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 “An international governance structure and listings will complete this vision” Fiat won’t pay a dividend, to maintain liquidity after the acquisition of Auburn Hills, Michigan-based Chrysler, Marchionne told analysts on a conference call.
 The acquisition of Bob’s Discount Furniture marks at least the third transaction in December for Boston-based Bain.
 GF Financial Markets was created from the $361 million acquisition of Natixis Commodity Markets last year by a unit of Guangzhou, China-based GF Securities.
 Bisaro found a solution last May when he announced the $5 billion acquisition of Warner Chilcott Plc, a smaller company that made birth control and acne treatments and was incorporated in Ireland.
 Southeast after PNC’s 2012 acquisition of RBC Bank USA.
 and Google Inc’s $32 billion acquisition of digital thermostat maker Nest Labs.
 Deal Talks Coca-Cola explored an acquisition of Monster in early 2012, according to a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified because the discussions were private.
 from BlueRun Ventures in June for $966 million and Cisco Systems Inc’s acquisition of software maker Intucell Ltd.
 The company expects to complete its 3 billion-yuan acquisition of Wuxi Suntech Power Co, the main unit of what was once the world’s largest photovoltaic maker, by the end of February after shareholders and Hong Kong’s securities’ regulator approve, Zhang said.
 19, 2012, the day before the acquisition of TNK-BP was announced to Sept.
 31 will include a higher-than-expected effective tax rate, increased severance and other operating expenses following consolidation and a $5 million charge related to the firm’s acquisition of fund-of-hedge-funds unit Fauchier Partners, according to the statement.
 It has the right of first refusal on an acquisition of Core’s stake, one person said.
 conference this month that he plans to do at least one “significant” deal in 2014 about the size of the the $87 billion acquisition of Bausch & Lomb or larger.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Google Inc’s sale of Motorola Mobility holds a clear lesson for Microsoft Corp’s acquisition of another smartphone maker, Nokia Oyj: Be a hardware or software company, not both.
 Microsoft is on track to close its $74 billion acquisition of Nokia’s handset business this quarter, seeking to regain lost ground in a market where its 37 percent share is eclipsed by Android and Apple Inc’s iPhone.
 The acquisition of Alexandria, Virginia-based Mandiant will expand the offerings of Milipitas, California-based FireEye, which was funded in part by the US.
 “We are working hard to get the early stages up to the pipeline, but the payback on these investments will not be in the next two years” Merck’s 2007 acquisition of Swiss biotechnology company Serono for 166 billion Swiss francs ($182 billion) hasn’t paid off.
 in December sealed a $4 billion loan backing its acquisition of US-based Smithfield Foods Inc.
 30, driven by the acquisition of Petra Foods Ltd’s cocoa unit.
 The acquisition of Alexandria, Virginia-based Mandiant is the latest move to consolidate providers of services that protect computer networks against hackers and spies.
 “With the acquisition of Brightstar, it seems that Son is consolidating his bet in the US.
 commercial real estate investments after the acquisition of New York’s 1 Chase Manhattan Plaza.
 “We tend to agree with this view” Riverbed has faced criticism over its 2012 acquisition of Opnet Technologies Inc, and it’s poised to report its first annual loss in seven years.
 “The proposed acquisition offers that liquidity, and if it closes, Ackman will receive over $173 billion from the deal” Suntory said Jan.
 Odigeo, with more than 15 million annual customers according to its website, was formed in 2011 with the merger of eDreams and Go Voyages, backed by Permira and Ardian respectively, alongside the acquisition of Opodo from Madrid-based travel services group Amadeus IT Holding SA.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Vladimir Evtushenkov’s holding company AFK Sistema is studying a potential acquisition of a stake in Latvia’s telecommunications operator Lattelecom SIA to expand beyond Russia.
 Spiegel last year turned down a $3 billion acquisition offer from Facebook Inc, a person familiar with the matter has said, inciting questions about whether Snapchat can reach that value on its own.
 20 after announcing the acquisition of Villa Guardia, Italy-based Gentium.
 in June for $966 million, and Cisco Systems Inc’s acquisition of software maker Intucell Ltd.
 The communications manufacturer’s $14 billion acquisition of Arinc Inc.
 SBA agreed last month to pay 153 billion reais for 2,007 Oi towers, or about 760,000 reais per tower -- more than twice the rate it paid for a previous acquisition of other Oi towers, according to Wells Fargo & Co.
 Malone’s Liberty Global Plc is putting the final touches on an acquisition of Dutch broadband provider Ziggo NV, people familiar with the matter said this month.
 German buyers accounted for 80 percent of deals, including Deutsche Wohnen AG’s acquisition of rival GSW Immobilien AG’s 60,000 units.
 Before the acquisition of Belo, newspaper publishing revenue of $37 billion accounted for about 70 percent of Gannett’s revenue and 43 percent of its operating income in 2012.
 Morgan Stanley increased the equity award for Gorman, 55, after he completed the acquisition of the firm’s brokerage unit and boosted margins in that division.
 The acquisition of Responsys probably renewed speculation that other companies in the industry such as Marketo may become targets as well, Patrick Walravens of JMP Group Inc.
 Over-the-Counter J&J has brought new medicines to the market the past two years while it integrated the 2012 acquisition of closely held device maker Synthes Inc, the largest purchase in company history.
 The company, partly owned by Norway’s Telenor ASA, is struggling to reduce spending and boost profitability to help cut $276 billion of gross debt stemming from the acquisition of telecommunications assets, including in Italy and Algeria, from Egyptian billionaire Naguib Sawiris in 2011.
 When Sawiris came back last year with a proposed acquisition of Manitoba Telecom Services Inc’s Allstream business services unit for C$520 million ($475 million), the same government rejected him on unspecified security grounds, prompting Sawiris to tell the Egyptian newspaper Al-Ahram he was “finished with Canada” Sawiris declined a request for an interview.
 Last year’s second-biggest loan was the $142 billion raised by Moscow-based Rosneft to finance the second part of its acquisition of oil producer TNK-BP.
 “We would like to see emerging market debt, fixed income and our property business grow” He said the company’s acquisition of Scottish Widows Investment Partnership from Lloyds Banking Group Plc, which is awaiting regulatory approval, was “progressing” and would help the firm to “significantly expand and diversify” its assets.
 Chief Executive Officer Richard Ridinger pledged to keepthe company intact after the $13 billion acquisition of Arch in2011 added cosmetic ingredients to a company involved inproducing active pharmaceutical products and solutions fortreating swimming pools.
 Only Pfizer Inc’s $642 billion deal for Wyeth LLC in 2009 and Verizon Communications Inc’s $130 billion acquisition of Vodafone Group Plc’s Verizon Wireless stake last year top the value of Charter’s offer.
 is adding to its range of artificial intelligence with the acquisition of DeepMind Technologies Ltd, a London-based startup founded by former chess prodigy and neuroscientist Demis Hassabis.
 executives encountered resistance from Justice Department antitrust officials to a potential acquisition of T-Mobile US Inc, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 executives and department officials about the company’s potential acquisition of T-Mobile.
 Telcordia Takeover The tall, blond Swede, who seldom wears a tie and is quickto grab a white-board marker to expound the virtues of mobileconnectivity, has expanded Ericsson’s services offering with the2012 acquisition of Telcordia Technologies for $115 billion andmore recently Microsoft’s own Mediaroom TV business.
 raised about $8 billion of debt last year to finance Liberty’s acquisition of the company.
 Green called the DM&E a “strong-growing regional railroad with solid growth potential” after Canadian Pacific announced the $148 billion acquisition of the entire line in September 2007.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Australia & New Zealand Banking Group Ltd, the country’s most Asia-focused lender, could explore an acquisition of Standard Chartered Plc, although a combination is unlikely, Citigroup Inc.
 Vodafone is battling Indian authorities over a $22 billion tax claim for its 2007 acquisition of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s local unit.
 “If they get a good price, then the asset sales, revaluation gains and debt will minimize the equity raising needed for funding a possible acquisition of a stake in Marina Bay Financial Centre Tower 3” The acquisition of the building in the Marina Bay area, the city’s new financial center, could be funded by debt, Singapore-based analysts Kai Yip and Regina Lim at Standard Chartered Plc said in a note to clients on Jan.
 AT&T executives were laying the groundwork internally for a potential acquisition of Vodafone this year, people with knowledge of the matter told Bloomberg News in November.
 Verizon branched out into data centers with its $14 billion acquisition of Terremark in 2011, teamed up with Redbox the next year on a streaming video service and plans to broadcast the Super Bowl over its LTE network on Feb 2.
 maker of memory chips, reported fiscal first-quarter revenue that topped analysts’ estimates after the acquisition of Elpida Memory Inc.
 remains interested in a potential acquisition of Vodafone Group Plc even after giving up the option to bid for the UK.
 Proceeds will help finance the acquisition of the parent of Beechcraft Corp, according to a regulatory filing.
 Executives of Dallas-based AT&T were laying the groundwork internally for a potential acquisition of Vodafone this year, people with knowledge of the matter told Bloomberg News in November.
 The patents on the block included those related to WebOS, the smartphone and tablet-computer operating system that the company bought through its 2010 acquisition of Palm Inc.
 The deal also includes technology from Hewlett-Packard’s 2007 acquisition of Bitfone Corp, a maker of device-management software.
 on its $159 billion acquisition of US.
 Actavis Plc announced the acquisition of Warner Chilcott for $78 billion on May 20 and completed the deal on October 1.
 Perrigo announced the acquisition of Elan for $62 billion on July 29 and completed the transaction in December.
 “This claim bears no relation to a limited Countrywide program that lasted several months and ended before Bank of America’s acquisition of the company,” Lawrence Grayson, a spokesman for the bank, said today in a phone interview.
 He also expanded the company’s international operations and completed the acquisition of 12 television networks across Northern Europe for $17 billion.
 The acquisition of the company’s units by Energisa SA was approved, Brazil electricity regulator head Romeu Rufino said today in Brasilia.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Marriott International Inc, the owner of such brands as the Ritz-Carlton and Renaissance, would consider buying more hotel-management companies after its acquisition of South Africa’s Protea Hospitality Holdings, Chief Executive Officer Arne Sorenson said.
 Acquisition Wave? The company, based in London, bought the private-bank businesses in in 1999 through its $985 billion acquisition of Edmond J.
 The deal builds on Sanofi’s $201 billion 2011 acquisition of Genzyme, which ranked as the world’s biggest maker of treatments for rare diseases.
 Charter Bid The asset sale would be contingent on Charter’s acquisition of Time Warner Cable, which still could fall through, said the people, who asked not to be named because the negotiations are private.
 and Mexico, and is seeking to expand in Argentina with the acquisition of Solvay SA’s assets in the country.
 30 to 463,996 tons, driven by the acquisition of Petra Foods Ltd’s cocoa business, the company said.
 Today’s announcement should help push forward Thermo’s acquisition of Life, said Ross Muken, an analyst with ISI Group LLC.
 GE’s acquisition of the Thermo Fisher assets is expected to close in the first half of this year, pending regulatory approval.
 Johannesburg-based Adcock, South Africa’s largest supplier of hospital products, is a takeover target for CFR Pharmaceuticals SA, Chile’s biggest drugmaker, which raised an acquisition offer by 2 percent to 128 billion rand ($12 billion) on Dec.
 Sales rose 16 percent to $44 billion, boosted by the Advate and Feiba hemophilia treatments and the acquisition of Sweden’s Gambro AB, Deerfield, Illinois-based Baxter said in a statement today.
 last year for about $16 billion, and people with knowledge of the matter said last week the company is putting the final touches on an acquisition of Dutch broadband carrier Ziggo NV.
 It completed the acquisition of 15 percent of Total E&P’s Congo unit in December, injecting $16 billion.
 climbed 27 percent after the company rejected an acquisition offer from Charter Communications Inc.
 The Silver Spring, Maryland-based company, which owns Animal Planet and TLC channels, bought the initial stake in Eurosport a year ago, around the same time it announced the acquisition of ProSiebenSat1’s SBS Nordic unit, which operates stations in Norway, Denmark and Sweden.
 The cancellations add to the woes of Kingfisher chairman Vijay Mallya after an Indian court last month voided Diageo Plc’s acquisition of a stake in the liquor tycoon’s United Spirits Ltd.
 The Nest purchase brings new devices and talent to Google, following the $124 billion acquisition of Motorola Mobility in 2012 and the company’s jump into connected products like Google Glass eyewear.
 and HSBC Holdings Plc about an all-debt financing for its acquisition of Hong Kong’s Wing Hang Bank Ltd, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 climbed 27 percent after rejecting an acquisition offer from Charter Communications Inc.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Cravath Swaine & Moore LLP and Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz are legal advisers in Martin Marietta Materials Inc’s $27 billion acquisition of cement maker Texas Industries Inc.
 Nichols, who in his eight years helped to integrate the $17 billion acquisition of Imperial Chemical Industries and reduce an inflated pension gap, will leave at the end of June, Akzo said in a statement today.
 for $15 billion, the first acquisition of a Hong Kong lender since 2009.
 He represented Pamplona Capital Management in connection with its $14 billion acquisition of Coinmach Services Corp.
 Fiat has said it expects to close its acquisition of the rest of Chrysler on or before Jan.
 De Beer also oversaw Cisco’s $5 billion acquisition of video software-maker NDS Group Ltd.
 rejected an acquisition offer from Charter Communications Inc.
 Only Pfizer Inc’s $642 billion deal for Wyeth LLC in 2009 and Verizon Communications Inc’s $130 billion acquisition of Vodafone Group Plc’s Verizon Wireless stake last year top the value of Charter’s offer.
 Ziggo NV rallied 36 percent after people familiar with the matter said Liberty Global Plc is preparing an acquisition of the Dutch broadband provider.
 Arbuthnott said he raised concerns about the acquisition of several companies, including PHS Group Plc and Ista International GmbH.
 “The acquisition of the property and addition of Saks will extend and significantly enhance the Toronto Eaton Centre customer experience,” Ramparas said.
 He also advised clients on transactions involving the formation and acquisition of REITs and on real estate acquisitions, dispositions, and restructurings, according to his Weil biography.
 The acquisition of Motorola’s handset business in 2012 threatened to alienate other device makers that also use Google’s Android mobile software, yet competed with Motorola.
 is jumping into digital home automation with its acquisition of Nest Labs Inc, shining a spotlight on an unproven market that has so far been filled with expensive devices that can’t communicate with each other.
 Kormos was involved in transactions that included Polish mobile-phone operator Polkontel’s debt sale in 2012 and Molson Coors Brewing Co’s acquisition of Czech beermaker StarBev LP.
 Whitman is also dealing with fallout from Hewlett-Packard’s $88 billion writedown of its 2011 acquisition of Autonomy Corp, an agreement struck by her predecessor, former CEO Leo Apotheker.
 While the acquisition of the Huffington Post and TechCrunch sites have helped fuel ad sales, his effort to create a nationwide local-news service faltered.
 The software maker is also integrating a $72 billion acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s handset unit as it tries to refashion itself into a hardware and cloud services company.
 The acquisition of Motorola, which had operating losses of more $1 billion last year according to data compiled by Bloomberg, adds new risks and challenges to Lenovo as the company seeks to integrate the deal and revive sales, Yang said.
 The $130 billion acquisition of Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in the wireless unit closed today.
 Schneider last month completed the acquisition of Invensys, a UK.
 Calvin Darden Jr, 39, who once worked as a Wall Street stockbroker, posed as his father in e-mails and on telephone calls and tricked lenders into providing him more than $8 million for the acquisition of the men’s magazine Maxim, while trying to con another investor out of $20 million, Manhattan US.
 “We expect a negative impact on Lenovo’s net profit -- at least in the near term -- from the acquisition of Motorola Mobility,” Morgan Stanley analysts led by Grace Chen said in a Jan.
 life insurer, expanded outside its main market with the $16 billion acquisition of American Life Insurance Co.
 That agreement followed the acquisition of Varian Semiconductor Equipment Associates Inc.
 “AGL believes there is a strong factual basis to demonstrate that the acquisition of Macgen will not result in a substantial lessening of competition,” the company said in the statement today.
 Aetna’s medical membership climbed 22 percent to 222 million at the end of 2013, largely due to its $87 billion acquisition of Coventry Health Care Inc.
 Comcast and Charter had been negotiating an asset sale after a potential Charter acquisition of Time Warner Cable, according to the people.
 With the acquisition of Canada Bread, debt is at a “perfect” level for Bimbo, he said.
 The lender plans to expand its corporate- and investment-banking operations across the continent after its acquisition of Barclays’ operations in eight African countries.
 The lender used restated figures to show how it would have performed if its acquisition of Barclays’ African operations had been included in previous financial reports.
 The 2006 acquisition of Jenny Craig diet centers backfired, and most of the business was sold in November.
 Exxon’s June 2010 acquisition of shale-gas explorer XTO has been criticized by analysts including Brian Youngberg of Edward Jones & Co.
 Acceleration Buechner brought forward a slew of cost cuts by one year, switching from his predecessor’s strategy of global expansion to a more forensic examination of Akzo’s inflated cost base following its $17 billion acquisition of Imperial Chemical Industries in 2008.
 The Philadelphia-based company’s proposed acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Brokerages including Morgan Stanley and UBS AG cut their rating on the stock on expectations of negative impact on the company’s earnings profit after its acquisition of Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Guaranty Trust Bank Plc, Nigeria’s largest lender by market value, completed its 86 billion Kenyan shilling ($100 million) acquisition of the east African nation’s Fina Bank Group after getting regulatory approval.
 Woodside faces growing pressure to make an acquisition of as much as $5 billion and may consider buying InterOil Corp.
 Fitch said today that the acquisition of Veyance will not have an immediate impact on Continental’s ratings.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Medtronic Inc, the world’s biggest maker of heart-rhythm devices, said fiscal third-quarter profit fell 23 percent after it took a charge for the 2010 acquisition of Ardian Inc.
 27 it received an acquisition offer by its parent Shanda Interactive Entertainment Ltd.
 The company has also considered an acquisition of Italian fixed-line company Fastweb SpA, people familiar with the matter said in June.
 Weil, Gotshal & Manges LLP advised Lenovo on the acquisition of the Motorola unit, while Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP represented the company in its deal for IBM’s server business.
 1 title insurer, last month completed the acquisition of Lender Processing Services Inc.
 Law Firms Get Clearance for $136 Billion Thermo Fisher Deal Axinn, Veltrop & Harkrider LLP, which worked with Slaughter & May as antitrust counsel to Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc, obtained antitrust clearance for the company’s $136 billion acquisition of Life Technologies Corp.
 “It’s a massive, massive mine” Dividend Payout Gold Fields will resume paying dividends after output climbed and costs fell following its acquisition of assets in Australia last year, it said in the statement.
 The firm is committing more than $1 billion of equity to its $415 billion buyout of Johnson & Johnson’s blood diagnostics unit, just under $1 billion to its $32 billion acquisition of Illinois Tool Works Inc’s industrial-packaging business and $400 million to its purchase of a minority stake in hair-products maker Vogue International, he said on the call.
 Deals Latham, Wachtell Take Prominent Role in Actavis-Forest Deal Latham & Watkins LLP advised Actavis Plc in its $25 billion stock and cash acquisition of Forest Laboratories Inc, which was represented by Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz.
 Smoke Alarms Google Inc’s $32 billion acquisition of Nest Labs, announced last month, gives the search giant access to Web-connected thermostats and smoke alarms and data on customers who track their energy use online.
 31 from $1127 billion at the end of the third quarter as its life insurance business, Athene Holding Ltd, completed its $18 billion acquisition of Aviva Plc’s US.
 The stock slump comes as Son considers an acquisition of T-Mobile, which is No.
 “With the acquisition of T-Mobile, SoftBank will be the second-largest mobile-phone company in the world,” Tomoaki Kawasaki, an analyst at Iwai Cosmo Holdings Inc.
 ranked as the seventh-biggest borrower last year with a $4 billion loan to back its acquisition of US-based Smithfield Foods Inc, the world’s biggest pork supplier, the data show.
 bank by assets, began its buildup in commodities trading with the 2008 acquisition of Bear Stearns Cos, which included an energy-trading platform.
 He also worked with Effron on News Corp’s 2007 acquisition of Dow Jones & Co, owner of the Wall Street Journal.
 He has worked before with Comcast, advising the cable company on its acquisition of AT&T Broadband, and was with Grupo Modelo SAB when the Mexican brewer was sold to Anheuser-Busch InBev NV.
 AECI will use the deal to build on its ImproChem division, which used the 2012 acquisition of General Electric Co’s chemical and monitoring solutions business to help build a platform for water-treatment sales in Africa and the Indian Ocean.
 “The acquisition of Global Index Advisors today will allow us to accelerate our expansion in the US,” said Mark Zinkula, CEO of L&G’s investment unit in London.
 “We are investing several hundred million euros in the acquisition of the DGAG portfolio.
 Annual Decline Barrick has forecast 2013 output of 7 million to 74 million ounces of gold, which would represent the fourth annual decline, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, and compares with a peak of 864 million ounces in 2006, when Barrick completed its acquisition of Placer Dome Inc.
 ONO is one of Europe’s few remaining major cable assets following Vodafone’s acquisition of Kabel Deutschland Holding AG and Liberty Global Plc’s purchase of Virgin Media Inc.
 United Bankshares Inc, based in Parkersburg, West Virginia, delayed its acquisition of Virginia Commerce Bancorp Inc.
 The deal is Bimbo’s biggest since its $25 billion acquisition of George Weston Ltd’s US.
 The Tyco chairman came back to Comcast the same week it announced the $45 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, the second-biggest cable carrier in the country.
 Among his recent work, Valverde advised on the acquisition of OHL Brasil by Abertis Infraestructuras SA in 2012.
 Rosneft’s March acquisition of TNK-BP increased its prior year’s earnings by more than 50 percent, the Moscow-based company said yesterday.
 Profit excluding certain items rose 16 percent at the Atlanta-based exchange operator in 2013, a year in which the 58-year-old Wisconsonite completed the acquisition of NYSE Euronext, adding stock trading and interest rate derivatives to the energy and credit contracts offered by ICE’s London operations.
 27 it received an acquisition offer by its parent Shanda Interactive Entertainment Ltd.
 Verizon will use the proceeds from selling the bonds to finance its acquisition of Vodafone’s stake in Verizon Wireless, according to an offer document for the securities.
 Other exits of Silver Lake Sumeru portfolio companies include SanDisk Corp’s acquisition of Smart Storage Systems Inc.
 Even as it helps Sprint revamp its network, Tokyo-based SoftBank has been eyeing an acquisition of T-Mobile US Inc.
 “But that always eventually comes to an end, and you are going to see defaults soar again” Acquisition Plan Artus, which has six employees, anticipates increasing in size through the acquisition of “certain assets of one or more investment advisers and/or financial institutions,” according to the SEC filing.
 with its acquisition of Nest Labs Inc.
 “We look forward to the acquisition of the company and a path forward for the Delaware plant” China’s Promise Investors see hope for electric cars through Tesla’s success and China’s subsidies for electric-vehicle purchases.
 Vodafone’s dispute dates back to the carrier’s 2007 acquisition of the Indian unit of Hong Kong-based Hutchison Whampoa Ltd, a deal on which it says no tax is payable.
 “Acquisitions should help in overseas markets” MetLife is using deals to bolster international growth, after the $16 billion acquisition of American Life Insurance Co.
 Bellevue, Washington-based T-Mobile had the second-highest subscriber gains last year, adding 21 million in the three quarters since it completed its acquisition of MetroPCS Communications Inc, compared with 41 million at Verizon and 18 million at AT&T, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “The acquisition of T-mobile is aimed at increasing customers in the US, and Son will take various measures to achieve the goal” The breakup fee has already emerged as a point of contention, said two of these people.
 30, helped by the acquisition of ING Investment Management Korea.
 Scotland’s largest money manager was cut to underperform, the equivalent of a sell rating, from hold at Jefferies Group LLC, which said the acquisition of Scottish Widows Investment Partnership won’t compensate for the slowdown in the company’s equity business.
 Whilethe acquisition of the Huffington Post and TechCrunch sites havehelped fuel ad sales, his effort to create a nationwide local-news service faltered.
 The agreement, which builds on VMware’s October acquisition of Desktone Inc, is intended to boost Google’s efforts to persuade corporate customers to choose its low-priced Chromebooks rather than Windows machines, VMware said in a statement.
 “The most probable reason for retaining earnings could be that the company is preparing its balance sheet for the acquisition of Telekom Slovenije,” Attila Gyurcsik, head of research at Budapest-based Concorde Securities Ltd, said in an e-mail.
 Gyurcsik said the company’s “revenue erosion” should slow this year, adding a future stock recommendation will depend on the details of the potential acquisition of Telekom Slovenije.
 Bondholders pushed the price higher after the announcement of the deal, which follows a rejected acquisition offer for Time Warner Cable of $13250 a share from Charter Communications Inc.
 plunged 12 percent to 1,463 yen in Tokyo after the online retailer announced its $900 million acquisition of Viber, an Internet messaging and calling service.
 In a statement on Grisay’s departure, Bramson said the former CEO had “achieved the successful acquisition of Thames River and steered the company through the most tumultuous period of market upheaval for 60 years” Johns Hopkins A self-described Anglophile, Grisay shook up F&C by removing six layers of management, reduced the number of investment committees and transferred some of the powers of the chief investment officer to the fund managers themselves, according to a 2006 profile in the UK’s Independent newspaper.
 “A greater than expected slowdown in Japan sales would raise concerns about the growth potential of the international business” Prudential expanded in Japan in 2011 with the acquisition of two life insurers from AIG.
 “We expect a negative impact on Lenovo’s net profit -- at least in the near term -- from the acquisition of Motorola Mobility,” Morgan Stanley analysts led by Grace Chen said in a Jan.
 retailer since the 2007 acquisition of Alliance Boots Plc.
 “In hindsight, a closer integration with the bank soon after the acquisition of MLC, would have put the business in a stronger position,” Hagger said.
 Lau stresses again that he did not commit any improper act whatsoever” Prosecutors accused Lau, chairman and chief executive officer of Chinese Estates Holdings Ltd, of bribery and money laundering in relation to the acquisition of land in Macau, Chinese Estates said in 2012.
 The operatoris struggling to cut its $275 billion debt pile, the result ofan acquisition of assets in Italy, Algeria and Asia.
 is in the process of completing its acquisition of Vivendi SA’s controlling stake in Maroc Telecom SA for about 42 billion euros ($57 billion).
 and HSBC Holdings Plc are also helping to raise $275 million via bonds to fund Blackstone Group LP consortium’s acquisition of Pactera Technology International Ltd, a person familiar said.
 The acquisition of Blyth Eastman Dillon proved more of a headache, as Paine Webber couldn’t keep up with the increased flow of paperwork, had to suspend bond and over-the-counter trading, and was censured by the US.
 “Regulators probably would have no problem about fixed-mobile consolidation in France,” said Andres Bolumburu, an analyst at Banco de Sabadell SA in Madrid, who drew comparison of a Numericable-SFR merger with Vodafone Group Plc’s acquisition of Kabel Deutschland Holding AG in Germany last year.
 “I can’t see any big hurdles in that sense” Regulators approved the acquisition of Kabel Deutschland by Vodafone for more than $10 billion in part because the transaction would keep Germany’s wireless network operators at four.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Comcast Corp’s proposed acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 By 2008, mounting losses on home loans triggered JPMorgan Chase & Co’s emergency acquisition of Bear Stearns Cos.
 “The company is in a position where it can allow itself to continue on the acquisition path and fend off acquisition offers,” Guil Bashan, analyst at IBI-Israel Brokerage & Investments Ltd, said by phone March 9.
 The acquisition of Aviva Sigorta “is a key milestone in the development of EMF’s strategy in Turkey,” CEO Peter Lovas said in a statement.
 23, adding to its acquisition of Nadra Bank in 2011, according to Group DF’s website.
 Representatives for Wesco and Grainger said they don’t comment on speculation, when asked if they were considering an acquisition of Anixter.
 No Mention Morgan Stanley was absent from the list even though it had been Forest’s bank of choice for years, even advising the company on its $29 billion acquisition of Aptalis Pharma Inc.
 The largest health-care REIT deal on record was Ventas’s acquisition of Nationwide Health Properties Inc.
 Spencer will run the Xbox business and former Nokia Oyj CEO Stephen Elop will join as executive vice president of the devices group when Microsoft completes its acquisition of Nokia’s handset unit.
 Hewlett-Packard may face questions from shareholders about her plans to bolster revenue, which fell last year, and the fallout from the company’s acquisition of Autonomy Corp, which resulted in an $88 billion writedown.
 The acquisition of Marfrig Alimentos SA’s former unit Seara, completed in October, may be weighing on JBS’s profitability, Banco BTG Pactual SA said.
 Sales rose 16 percent to $44 billion, boosted by the Advate and Feiba hemophilia treatments and the acquisition of Sweden’s Gambro AB, a maker of dialysis products.
 Merrill Deal Through the acquisition of Bank of America Corp’s non-US.
 is completing the acquisition of Vivendi SA’s controlling stake in Maroc Telecom SA for about 42 billion euros ($57 billion).
 Vodafone Competition Fourth-quarter adjusted Ebitda rose 13 percent to 406 billion euros, while sales jumped 65 percent to 157 billion euros, helped by the acquisition of MetroPCS Communications Inc.
 The acquisition of the Standard Bank unit was announced March 14.
 “The acquisition of Burneftegaz fully meets the requirements of our strategy for the upstream segment,” said Chief Executive Officer Alexander Korsik.
 ‘Hot Topic’ “The acquisition of generic companies has now become a very hot topic,” Kolbert, who has a buy rating for Teva, said in a March 20 phone interview from New York.
 Daunting Goals Buechele’s switch from a $25-billion company in Helsinki to a $37 billion one in Munich entails a move to industrial gases and a market leader that’s been under continuous overhaul since Linde’s $16 billion acquisition of UK.
 Prosecutors accused Joseph Lau of bribery and money laundering in relation to the acquisition of land in Macau, Chinese Estates said in 2012.
 The company’s finances and increased management experience on buying companies would allow it to “easily accommodate” an acquisition of up to $4 billion, he said today.
 JPMorgan’s commodities trading surged with the 2008 acquisition of Bear Stearns Cos, which included an energy-trading platform.
 While the competition commission’s ruling isn’t likely to derail the acquisition of the restaurants from Wal-Mart de Mexico SAB, it will change the timetable for the offering of more than 5 billion pesos ($3799 million), the people said, asking not to be identified because the details are private.
 RBC’s bankers used their efforts in the Rural/Metro sale to persuade Clayton Dubilier & Rice in 2011 to allow the bank to provide $10 million in financing as part of the $32 billion acquisition of Emergency Medical Services Corp, investors’ lawyers said in court filings.
 RBC’s bankers also knew the lender “was not disclosing its interest in obtaining a role financing the acquisition of EMS or how it intended to use the Rural process to capture the EMS financing business,” the judge said.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Davide Campari-Milano SpA’s acquisition of Canada’s largest independent distiller highlights the appeal of the country’s whiskey amid a revival in demand for the brown spirits.
 It’s on track to complete its acquisition of GSW Immobilien AG, making it Germany’s second-largest apartment owner after Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE.
 Repsol SA, Spain’s biggest oil producer, has considered an acquisition of Pacific within the past year though it decided for the time being not to pursue a deal, two of the people said.
 The operator, part-owned by Norway’s Telenor ASA, is also struggling to cut its $275 billion debt which resulted from an acquisition of telecommunications assets in Italy, Algeria and Asia from Egyptian billionaire Naguib Sawiris about three years ago.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Mozambique’s government said it’s in talks with Rio Tinto Group over capital gains tax on the company’s $42 billion acquisition of Benga coal mines from Riversdale Mining Ltd.
 is offering to help a smaller rival become Ireland’s fourth mobile operator in a bid to win European Union approval for its acquisition of Telefonica SA’s O2 Ireland unit, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 The maker of semiconductor wafer cleaners needs to boost its competitiveness after Applied Materials Inc’s acquisition of Tokyo Electron Ltd, Eiji Kakiuchi, Dainippon’s incoming president, said in an interview.
 The Applied Materials acquisition of Tokyo Electron “had a huge impact,” he said.
 Acquiring Subscribers Charter is considering buying some of the 3 million subscribers that Comcast plans to sell following the acquisition of Time Warner Cable, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 subprime mortgage market in 2003 with the acquisition of Household and by 2006 had become the largest subprime lender and the second-largest subprime loan servicer in the United States,” Cook County said in its Chicago complaint, referring to HSBC acquiring Household International Inc.
 Ergen, 61, made the approach in response to Comcast Corp’s $45 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Branching Out An acquisition of SABMiller would give AB InBev more than $7 billion of revenue in Africa with brands including Castle and almost $4 billion of sales in Asia, reducing AB InBev’s dependence on the Americas and Brazil, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 predict its acquisition of Vips restaurants will help double profit by 2015.
 Pistorius’s acquisition of the guns was canceled about a month after he had shot Steenkamp, Rens said.
 Citigroup and Bank of America Corp, for instance, helped coordinate $31 billion of loans to finance Rosneft’s acquisition of TNK-BP about a year ago.
 Aggregate Bond Index, which follows the broad debt markets, as well as indexes acquired as part of the London-based bank’s acquisition of assets from Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 in its $16 billion acquisition of LIN Media LLC.
 It provides non-programming services such as sales and management to 20 stations in 17 markets, and would create shared arrangements in three more markets through an acquisition of stations owned by the Allbritton family.
 Bridgepoint has expanded CABB since its acquisition of the Sulzbach-based monochloroacetic acid maker in 2011.
 Comcast Corp’s buyout of the remainder of NBCUniversal from General Electric Co, and Verizon Communications Inc’s acquisition of Verizon Wireless from Vodafone Group Plc were two 2013 deals driven by financial concerns and cheap debt, rather than “building influence in their particular industries,” Carr said.
 Altice sold $17 billion of high-yield bonds in December to fund its acquisition of Orange SA’s unit in the Dominican Republic and a month later raised about 13 billion euros in an initial public offering.
 The bid backfired, resulting in the 1982 acquisition of Bendix by Allied Corp.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Davide Campari-Milano SpA’s acquisition of Canada’s largest independent distiller highlights the appeal of the country’s whiskey amid a revival in demand for the brown spirits.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Comcast Corp’s proposed acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Greenland’s purchase of the former Sydney water board office for A$1075 million, and the acquisition of two buildings overlooking the city’s Hyde Park by Far East and pension fund CBUS Super for A$143 million and A$59 million respectively were among last year’s biggest transactions for conversion, according to Colliers.
 The $111 billion acquisition of Autonomy Corp.
 for $15 billion, the first acquisition of a Hong Kong lender since 2009.
 To address concerns that an acquisition of SFR would reduce competition, Bouygues agreed to sell some wireless spectrum and its transmission network to Iliad.
 Julius Baer awarded Collardi, 39, compensation of 59 million Swiss francs ($67 million) for 2013, down from 67 million francs a year earlier, after an 800,000-franc one-time payment related to the acquisition of Bank of America Corp’s non-US.
 is planning to increase its share buyback program by more than 80 percent if investors approve its $45 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, boosting shareholder returns.
 “It’s an exciting time to back tech startups” Accel said it has made more than $9 billion in the past year from transactions involving its portfolio companies, including the acquisition of AirWatch LLC by VMware Inc, the purchase of Braintree Payment Solutions LLC by EBay Inc, and MoPub Inc’s sale to Twitter Inc.
 Maurel, which is 24 percent-held by Henin, has announced the acquisition of stakes in ventures off Myanmar, the Alberta oil sands in Canada and a deal to explore and develop unconventional reserves in the Gaspe region of Quebec.
 The company is the second-largest maker of business applications, behind SAP AG, and it entered the computer-server market with the 2010 acquisition of Sun Microsystems.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Emirates Telecommunications Corp, the most valuable company in the United Arab Emirates, plans to complete the acquisition of a controlling stake in Maroc Telecom SA by the end of May, its chief financial officer said.
 It provides non-programming services such as sales and management to 20 stations in 17 markets, and would create shared-services arrangements in three more markets through an acquisition of stations owned by the Allbritton family.
March 3 (Bloomberg) -- China Fishery Group Ltd, the biggest anchovy-quota holder in Peru following its acquisition of Oslo-listed Copeinca ASA, may be downgraded after the buyout sent its debt levels soaring.
 The acquisition of K-Y “is just another small step to a bigger and bigger piece of the pie in consumer health,” Bernstein analyst Andrew Wood said today via e-mail.
 Marriott, the largest publicly traded hotel chain after Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc, will almost double its rooms in Africa to about 23,000 with the acquisition of Protea, helping it expand in a continent where a growing middle class and rising travel are fueling the fastest pace of hotel development in the world.
 “Their improved bottom line is making their decision-making process faster” SoftBank billionaire founder Masayoshi Son has been considering an acquisition of T-Mobile US Inc, people familiar with the situation have said.
 Philadelphia-based Comcast is also seeking regulatory approval for its $45 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable, giving it more subscribers to increase its influence over cable networks in fee negotiations.
 Peladeau’s time as head of the company his late father founded saw a 48 percent return for the company’s Class B stock and the C$57 billion ($51 billion) acquisition of cable operator Groupe Videotron in 2000.
 on its $159 billion acquisition of US.
 In December, the company completed the acquisition of East Horizon Gas Co, a unit of Oando Plc, for $250 million.
 That transaction, rather than an acquisition of the stake itself, made Oil Search’s preemption rights unclear, Bernstein’s Beveridge said.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Facebook Inc’s $19 billion acquisition of WhatsApp Inc.
 “The technology base was built specifically for this post-PC era” Dolce joined Akamai, which helps corporate customers speed delivery of online content, through its 2012 acquisition of his previous company, Verivue Inc.
 Hewlett-Packard may face questions from shareholders about her plans to bolster revenue, which fell last year, and the fallout from the company’s acquisition of Autonomy Corp, which resulted in an $88 billion writedown.
 is in the process of completing its acquisition of Vivendi SA’s controlling stake in Maroc Telecom SA for about 42 billion euros ($57 billion).
 Bankruptcy Court in Manhattan, during closing arguments in a trial over Ergen’s acquisition of $1 billion in LightSquared debt.
 The French company’s chief executive officer, Chris Viehbacher, whose signature deal since becoming CEO in 2008 was the $201 billion acquisition of Genzyme in 2011, said in an interview last month that he’s not contemplating doing another large deal as he pursues a strategy of partnerships with biotechnology companies.
 North America Cowdery has since turned his attention to the North American life-insurance market with his first $600 million acquisition of a unit from Allstate Corp.
 Philip Falcone’s LightSquared sued Ergen over the acquisition of $1 billion in LightSquared debt.
 last year for $11 billion and AirWatch was VMware’s second purchase in two years, after the $126 billion acquisition of software networking startup Nicira Inc.
 One of the first investments was the acquisition of a 61 percent stake in Urbplan, then known as Scopel Desenvolvimento Urbano SA, a family-owned real estate company in Sao Paulo that focused on middle- and low-income housing as well as first-time homebuyers.
 Michael Freeman, a spokesman for Salix, said the company had no comment when asked if it was considering an acquisition of Furiex.
 Representatives for Actavis and Takeda declined to comment when asked if they were considering an acquisition of Furiex.
 BP entered exploration and production in Brazil with the March 2010 acquisition of 10 concessions from Devon Energy Corp, with a target of producing at least 100,000 barrels a day by the end of the decade.
 Fast Retailing is in early talks about a potentialacquisition of J.
 is the latest corporation to consider reducing its tax bill by moving its legal address outside the US, proposing an acquisition of London-based AstraZeneca Plc that would allow Pfizer to reincorporate in the UK.
 Most of the gain will come from the titanium dioxide pigment business as prices rise and the company closes on its pending acquisition of a unit from Rockwood Holdings Inc.
 on the $130 billion acquisition of Vodafone’s stake in their US.
 Jodi Seth, a spokeswoman for Facebook, said of the FTC letter today: “We’re pleased the FTC has completed its review and cleared our acquisition of WhatsApp” Privacy Complaints The Electronic Privacy Information Center and Center for Digital Democracy filed a complaint with the FTC on March 6, saying the purchase may be an unfair trade practice because users of the messaging service had an expectation that their data wouldn’t be collected for advertising purposes.
 Thompson headed Symantec when it got into storage with a $102 billion acquisition of Veritas Software Corp.
 Daiichi’s stock has lost about 36 percent since it announced the acquisition of the Ranbaxy stake.
 After the acquisition of Ranbaxy, he will own 547 percent of Sun Pharma.
 The acquisition of the oncology drugs will heighten Novartis’s competition with with crosstown rival Roche Holding AG, the world’s largest maker of cancer medicines.
 JPMorgan’s commodities trading surged with the 2008 acquisition of Bear Stearns Cos, which included an energy-trading platform.
 Leading a successful acquisition of Newmont, in what would be the biggest gold takeover, would set up Barrick to do further deals, including ones involving other commodities.
 on its $22 billion acquisition of Sprint Corp.
 “It allows us to be manically and singularly focused on growing the public-safety business” Gustafsson said he had been interested in a potential acquisition of the Motorola unit for five years.
 In his two years at the Norwalk, Connecticut-based company, Maestri helped integrate the 2009 acquisition of technology-services company Affiliated Computer Services.
 First-quarter revenue rose 47 percent to $14 billion, helped by the acquisition of Coventry Health Care Inc, Aetna said.
 The purchase won’t affect the timing of Actavis’s $25 billion acquisition of Forest announced in February, the company said.
 It will also bolster Actavis’s position in medicines for gastrointestinal ailments, along with Forest’s $29 billion acquisition of Aptalis earlier this year.
 said it will use the proceeds to fund the acquisition of the UK.
 Fast Retailing is in early talks about a potential acquisition of J.
 The acquisition of Carter Holt Harvey’s pulp and paper business will enable Oji to source softwoods for use in cardboard and tissues, for which demand is expected to grow from developing countries, INCJ said in its statement.
 Munk’s Legacy Munk, 86, has pursued big deals in the past, includingBarrick’s 2006 acquisition of Placer Dome Inc.
April 9 (Bloomberg) -- Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility named product management executive Rick Osterloh as president of the unit ahead of Lenovo Group Ltd’s planned acquisition of the handset business.
 The company’s market value at yesterday’s close was $42 billion, meaning an acquisition of Allergan would likely more than double its worth and put it about halfway to its goal.
 There will be more to come in term of exits” Lehman Start McGee, a Texan who started at Lehman in 1993 and rose to head its investment bank, worked on an acquisition for Exxon Mobil Corp, the world’s second-biggest company by market value, and the 2007 acquisition of the former TXU Corp, the largest leveraged buyout ever.
 Actavis, once its announced $25 billion acquisition of Forest Laboratories Inc.
 UBS AG raised its rating on Europe’s largest home-improvement company to buy from neutral, citing the possibility of higher profits from its potential acquisition of Mr Bricolage SA in France.
 He told Lazorchak of Stryker’s plans to buy Orthovita, and Lazorchak told him about Celgene’s planned acquisition of Pharmion, authorities said.
 Its last acquisition of size was Genentech Inc.
 In his first round as CEO, he oversaw the $57 billion acquisition of Gillette Co, expanded P&G’s overseas presence and presided over the introduction of successful new products, such as the Swiffer cleaner.
 The service was born out of Apple’s 2010 acquisition of a company of the same name.
 on its acquisition of 375 percent of Maple Leaf Sports & Entertainment, owner of the NHL’s Toronto Maple Leafs and the NBA’s Raptors, from Ontario Teachers’ Pension Plan in August 2012.
 While its purchase of PayPal more than a decade ago has created one of the company’s biggest businesses, its 2005 acquisition of Internet telephony company Skype led to a writedown two years later.
 JPMorgan advised Nets Holding A/S on its sale to Advent International Corp, Bain Capital LLC and Danish pension fund ATP last month, as well as Jyske Bank A/S on its acquisition of BRFkredit A/S for about $136 billion in February.
 Another way to fend off Valeant and Allergan’s largest shareholder Bill Ackman, who supports the offer, is for Allergan to make its own acquisition of a company outside the US.
 That may make an acquisition of Allergan even more compelling for the company, Waterhouse said.
 Lilly obtained the drug through its acquisition of ImClone Systems Inc.
 Adjusted for the January acquisition of Royal Dutch Shell Plc’s 163 percent stake in Ceska Rafinerska, Unipetrol posted a quarterly net loss of 249 million koruna.
 Slim has also been building up his programming, with a stake in soccer team Club Pachuca, the rights to air the Olympics and a library of shows and movies through the acquisition of DLA Inc.
 in 2000, and Rio Tinto Group’s $429 billion acquisition of Alcan Inc.
 provided significant evidence to support its prediction that low-cost carriers, such as Southwest Airlines, “will provide meaningful and effective competition through their acquisition of the divested assets,” Kollar-Kotelly wrote in her decision yesterday.
 Microsoft will bolster its smartphone offerings through the acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s device and services business for $75 billion, a deal that the companies expect to close today.
 Demand soared after Paris-based Drahi offered yields that were higher than market rates to fund the $23 billion acquisition of Vivendi SA’s French phone business.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Emirates Telecommunications Corp, the most valuable listed company in the United Arab Emirates, signed a 315 billion-euro ($436 billion) deal with 17 banks to fund its acquisition of Vivendi SA’s stake in Maroc Telecom.
 “You could argue that government policy has driven that, in which case, they’re hardly going to try to nix the deal” France’s Alstom Across the English Channel, French officials are weighing the potential acquisition of Alstom SA, the company that built the country’s power grid.
 Viehbacher’s signature deal since becoming CEO in 2008 was the $201 billion acquisition of Genzyme in 2011.
 Comcast has already said it plans to divest about 3 million subscribers as part of its $452 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, and the agreement is contingent on that deal closing.
 in its planned acquisition of Canada Pension Plan Investment Board’s Air Distribution Technologies business for $16 billion, adding ventilation products.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Patrick Drahi met investors today to start marketing the biggest high-yield bond sale globally to finance his $23 billion acquisition of French phone company SFR.
 The Munich-based company last year bought British production-planning software specialist Preactor International Ltd, adding to the 680 million-euro ($938 million) acquisition of Belgian software maker LMS International in 2012.
 Huge Quantity “The acquisition of a sales channel is not what we are looking at,” Weckesser said in the interview.
 The French company last year bought a 50 percent stake in Russia’s Electroshield-Samara it didn’t already own, and in January completed the acquisition of Invensys, a UK.
 “Malaysia is a key part of Sanlam’s future growth strategy and the acquisition of a majority shareholding in MCIS Zurich will entrench our presence,” Sanlam Emerging Markets Chief Executive Officer Heinie Werth said in the statement.
 “An acquisition of T-Mobile would increase Sprint’s ability to compete in the US.
 Unprepared AT&T Sprint wants to pursue a deal while the Justice Department and FCC are also reviewing Comcast Corp’s acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, with the hope that regulators will see both deals as changing the telecommunications industry, three of the people said.
 Aberdeen Asset Management Plc rallied 67 percent after saying it will generate greater cost savings from its acquisition of Scottish Widows Investment Partnership than it had expected.
 Blackstone’s potential acquisition of the seven assets -- an office building and two industrial sites in Sydney, two offices in Queensland and one in Canberra, and a shopping mall in Melbourne -- is also priced at a premium to their Dec.
 It became the largest gold producer with its $102 billion hostile acquisition of Placer Dome Inc.
 Net income jumped 50 percent last year after its $55 billion acquisition of TNK-BP, the former venture between BP Plc and a group of billionaires, the company said in February.
 The acquisition of Diana will enable Symrise to close the gap on larger rivals Givaudan SA and International Flavors & Fragrances Inc.
 investors as he finances the acquisition of Vivendi SA’s French phone unit with the world’s biggest junk bond offering.
 Munk’s Legacy Munk, 86, has pursued big deals in the past, including Barrick’s 2006 acquisition of Placer Dome Inc.
 Most of the late-stage assets were in-house before Soriot arrived, according to Leuchten, including drugs from AstraZeneca’s $152 billion acquisition of MedImmune Inc.
 Crane said in November the company was considering an acquisition of a regulated utility because it wanted to shift to assets that provide steady and predictable returns.
 Twitter’s new products build off its acquisition of MoPub Inc, a mobile-advertising exchange, which gives it an existing network of ad buyers.
 Another Elephant The acquisition of Heinz for more than $23 billion sparked speculation that Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway and 3G Capital may turn next to other food companies such as Campbell Soup Co.
 PepsiCo, which rejected a call from activist investor Nelson Peltz to break it up, could use an acquisition of Kellogg to bolster its breakfast offerings and add brands like Pringles and Keebler cookies to its snacks portfolio, he said.
 Acquisition Digestion While Windley said Aetna could also be interested in WellCare, Credit Suisse’s Carter said the Hartford, Connecticut-based company is still digesting its 2013 acquisition of Coventry Health Care Inc, which may make a deal more challenging in the near term.
 Saladrigas and Tyler, who both joined as part of Duke’s acquisition of Progress Energy Inc, have been board members for 13 and 6 years, respectively.
 Assets under management at Carlyle rose 53 percent to $1989 billion from $1888 billion at the end of the fourth quarter, driven by the firm’s acquisition of Diversified Global Asset Management Co, an investor in hedge funds.
 “We are presented with opportunities on a weekly basis” Fractured Market The acquisition of Easton Baseball, the company’s largest, is part of Bauer’s strategy of gaining share in a fractured market by buying brands that are already recognized by athletes as leaders in their sport and then expanding them through aggressive product development.
 The review and decision not to exercise the option weren’t related to Novartis’s announcement last week of a planned acquisition of GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer medicine business for as much as $16 billion, she said.
 Evonik, Germany’s second-biggest chemicals company after BASF SE, is ready to make acquisitions “if they fit,” Chief Financial Officer Ute Wolf said in a newspaper interview this month, adding that the acquisition of larger companies is possible.
 Still, the acquisition of Bayer Material Science would be sizable for Evonik.
 It also said funds under management after its acquisition of Scottish Widows Investment Partnership totaled 3245 billion pounds on Feb.
 investors as he financesthe acquisition of Vivendi SA’s French phone unit with theworld’s biggest junk bond offering.
 Robotics, Mapping Google could use the acquisition of Titan, based in Moriarty, New Mexico, for more than just connecting people to the Internet, said Greg Sterling, an analyst at Opus Research in San Francisco.
 Latham & Watkins LLP is advising Actavis in connection with Forest’s acquisition of Furiex and Actavis’s acquisition of Forest.
 1 industrial gas supplier partly thanks to the $14 billion acquisition of larger UK.
 An acquisition of AstraZeneca would add early-stage drugs in a field of cancer treatments that use the body’s own immune cells to recognize and attack cancer.
 “That price would have to begin with a 50 and not a 40” An acquisition of AstraZeneca would add to the $127 billion of mergers among pharmaceutical companies this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- White & Case LLP advised Zimmer Holdings Inc, a maker of artificial hips and knees, in its acquisition of Biomet Inc.
 Stafford also presided over the $97 billion acquisition of American Cyanamid Co.
 Assets under management rose to $1023 billion from $943 billion at the end of last year, with most of the increase coming from its acquisition of European credit investor Avoca Capital, which added $84 billion.
 “Both the IP and data he will obtain from the acquisition of Hundsun Technologies will further enhance his analysis for finance and credit” Hundsun, founded by eight engineers in 1995, works with clients in government and in the finance, transportation and education industries, according to its website.
April 12 (Bloomberg) -- Oil India Ltd, the nation’s second-biggest state-run explorer, is studying an acquisition of Nigerian oil and gas assets owned by Royal Dutch Shell Plc, according to people familiar with the matter.
 UBS raised its rating for the company to buy from neutral, citing the possibility of higher profits from its proposed acquisition of Mr Bricolage SA in France.
 Snapchat Inc, the popular application for sending disappearing annotated photos, rebuffed a $3 billion acquisition offer from Facebook last year.
 Comcast has already said it plans to divest about 3 million subscribers as part of its acquisition of Time Warner Cable, and the agreement is contingent on that deal closing.
 In 2011, it expanded into West Virginia with the acquisition of International Resource Partners, which brought metallurgical coal to its business.
 The error had gone undetected since the firm’s acquisition of Merrill Lynch in 2009, said the person, who requested anonymity because the information hasn’t been made public.
 “It was something that was structured in a solid way to finance the acquisition of the concessions,” Nkand said.
 Societe Generale said it completed the acquisition of the remaining 50 percent of derivatives brokerage Newedge Group yesterday from Credit Agricole in exchange for a 5 percent stake in Amundi Group.
 In a single acquisition of Texas shale lands from Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc.
 “DirecTV has a better growth profile, but Dish has valuable spectrum” Comcast’s proposed acquisition of Time Warner Cable was the starting gun of sorts for a new M&A race.
 In February, Verizon completed its $130 billion acquisition of Vodafone’s 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless, and it had $29 billion of cash as of March.
 NRG, the nation’s largest competitive power producer, may consider shutting some plants it acquired through its acquisition of Edison Mission Energy, Prabhu said.
 Lemtrada, approved in the European Union in September, was a key part of Sanofi’s $20 billion acquisition of Genzyme in 2011.
 Its acquisition of Dublin-based Actavis Plc’s commercial operations in seven European countries this year also gives it scale and access to other markets, said Ranjit Kapadia, an analyst at Centrum Broking Pvt.
 At Lehman, Magnoni helped lead Olivetti SpA’s $34 billion hostile acquisition of Telecom Italia SpA in 1999.
 was near an acquisition of Beats Electronics LLC for $32 billion, Beats co-founder Dr.
 Abel completed the $56 billion acquisition of NV Energy, Nevada’s largest electric utility, in December and announced a deal May 1 to buy SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink for about $29 billion to expand in electricity transmission in western Canada.
 Safran said in 2010 it had studied an acquisition of Zodiac Aerospace, B/E’s closest competitor for aircraft seats, and decided against making an offer.
 Among GIC’s major transactions in 2013 were the purchase of a 50 percent stake in London’s Broadgate office complex and the acquisition of a 285 percent stake in Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s European insurance business.
 The PLA hackers broke into the company’s computer systems and were pilfering sensitive files about its attempted $24 billion acquisition of China Huiyuan Juice Group, according to an internal company document detailing the intrusion.
 Tourism is one of the mainstays of the economy of Crimea, which National Geographic magazine named one of the world’s top travel destinations last year, calling it “a diamond suspended from the south coast of Ukraine” Colonized by ancient Romans as well as Greeks, Crimea was part of the Ottoman Empire until Catherine the Great’s lover Grigory Potemkin engineered Russia’s peaceful acquisition of the peninsula in 1783, writing “Russia needs its paradise” Soviet leader Nikita Khrushchev gave Crimea to Ukraine in 1954, a move Putin called a mistake that needed to be rectified.
 “They came to us” Allen Grunes, a former lawyer with the Justice Department’s antitrust division who is now at GeyerGorey LLP, told lawmakers that Comcast’s acquisition of Time Warner Cable would give the combined company the incentive to withhold programming from rivals and the ability to limit competition from online distributors like Netflix.
 The takeover was the second-largest in the bank’s 196-year history, trailing only the C$41 billion acquisition of Marshall & Ilsley Corp.
 Following the $265 billion acquisition of BNSF, the railroad company terminated a $12 billion credit facility, signaling it could potentially turn to Berkshire for that type of funding if needed, according to Levington.
 The debt, which pays a 525 percent coupon, helped finance the company’s $800 million acquisition of GeoEye Inc.
 Madalena’s production in Argentina will increase by 3,028 barrels of oil equivalent a day after the acquisition of conventional fields owned by Gran Tierra, the companies said today in separate statements.
 rules that raise costs and the delay in M&T Bank Corp’s acquisition of New Jersey’s Hudson City Bancorp.
 Its acquisition of Virgin Media Inc.
 Vodafone has said it didn’t owe taxes because the acquisition of Hong Kong-based Hutchison’s business was between two international companies, with the target asset registered in the Cayman Islands.
 in April, part of the software company’s acquisition of Nokia’s handset unit, because of a tax standoff.
 to market the course, which it bought in February 2013 as part of its $15 billion acquisition of bankrupt resorts owned by a group led by hedge fund Paulson & Co.
 Mergers that began with America West Holdings’ acquisition of US Airways Group Inc.
 Both executives resisted pressure to sell Symantec’s data-storage business, which Symantec entered with its $102 billion acquisition of Veritas Software Corp.
 Siemens had been evaluating an acquisition of Dresser-Rand Group Inc, the Houston-based oilfield equipment maker, since as early as 2011, people familiar with the plans told Bloomberg last year.
 The Pfizer CEO told the governors of Maryland and Delaware in a letter yesterday it’s too soon to determine what effect an acquisition of AstraZeneca would have on jobs and manufacturing in their states.
 It’s not going to happen overnight” Fiat will also need to come up with the money for the investments laid out today against a backdrop of mounting debt, which the automaker forecasts will rise to 103 billion euros by the end of the year after the acquisition of Chrysler.
 For-profit college operator Anhanguera Educacional Participacoes SA surged as Kroton Educacional SA released new terms for its acquisition of the company, easing concern that the deal will collapse.
 told regulators it’s willing to surrender three television-station licenses to complete a $985 million acquisition of Allbritton family ABC affiliates in Washington and other cities.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Merck KGaA, the maker of the Erbitux cancer drug, forecast a “moderate increase” in sales and profit in 2014 because of the acquisition of AZ Electronic Materials SA, a chemicals supplier to the electronics industry.
 The company completed the 16 billion-pound ($27 billion) acquisition of AZ this month.
 In February, Toll completed its $16 billion acquisition of California builder Shapell Homes, adding to costs and narrowing its profit margin for the quarter.
 said Chairman Takashi Shoda, who headed the drugmaker through its acquisition of India’s Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd, is stepping down.
 The communications equipment provider said it would save an extra $25 million on cost efficiencies from its acquisition of Aastra, according to a statement.
 While its purchase of PayPal more than a decade ago has created one of the company’s biggest businesses, its 2005 acquisition of Internet telephony company Skype led to a writedown two years later.
 30, 2010, taking over a company that had already started eliminating 15,000 jobs and closing facilities after its acquisition of Schering-Plough Corp.
 Most Acreage The company’s global production fell to the equivalent of 415 million barrels a day, the lowest first-quarter average since Exxon’s 1999 acquisition of Mobil.
 and the acquisition of a stake in Banco Unico in Mozambique.
 Transmission Infrastructure “The acquisition of AltaLink represents a great long-term opportunity to invest in Alberta’s critical transmission infrastructure,” Abel said in a statement.
 This restriction that prevents further negotiation on value is a consequence of Pfizer’s actions” The Takeover Panel, the world’s oldest acquisition oversight body, introduced tougher rules in 2011, a year after the hostile acquisition of chocolate maker Cadbury Plc by Kraft Foods Group Inc.
 Assets under management still increased to 3245 billion pounds, boosted by Aberdeen’s acquisition of Scottish Widows Investment Partnership.
 lawmakers sent a letter to the Federal Trade Commission, raising concerns that a Valeant acquisition of Allergan “could have significant anti-competitive consequences that adversely affect consumers, patients and physician providers” “Of particular concern is the likelihood that Allergan’s robust research and development portfolio will be compromised,” the members of the House of Representatives said.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- AT&T Inc, a longtime ally of billionaire Carlos Slim, is now headed toward a partnership in Mexico with one of his fiercest rivals, Grupo Televisa SAB, as a result of its $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV.
 AT&T’s acquisition of DirecTV, announced earlier this week, still requires regulatory approval, and the companies expect the transaction to close in 12 months.
 Morrice, 51, has led the bank in the region for the past 12 years, and started building the investment banking and cash equities business in 2010 as part of a global expansion following the acquisition of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s US.
 Vodafone has said it didn’t owe taxes because the acquisition of Hong Kong-based Hutchison’s business was between two international companies, with the target asset registered in the Cayman Islands.
 Eastern Europe Deutsche Telekom is prepared to do smaller deals like its acquisition of GTS Central Europe, which gave the company fixed-line assets in countries including Poland and the Czech Republic, he said.
 New Towers SBA, based in Boca Raton, Florida, agreed in December to pay 153 billion reais ($693 million) for 2,007 Oi SA towers, or about 760,000 reais per tower -- more than twice the price it paid for a previous acquisition of other Oi towers, according to Wells Fargo & Co.
 Hayward, 56, became interim chairman last year as the Baar, Switzerland-based company completed a $29 billion acquisition of Xstrata Plc and shareholders ousted then-interim Chairman John Bond.
 An acquisition of Russell Investments Ltd.
 AT&T’s bid this week to buy satellite-TV provider DirecTV for $485 billion comes three months after Comcast proposed a $452 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Chief Executive Officer Heinz-Juergen Bertram is expanding Symrise with the acquisition of Diana Ingredients SAS, a 13 billion-euro purchase that will add pet-food ingredients and bolster access to natural raw materials.
 RBS bought Ulster in 2000 as part of its acquisition ofNational Westminster Bank Plc.
 He has been trying to build Los Angeles-based Snapchat, which makes a mobile application for disappearing photo messages, into a bigger business after turning down an acquisition offer from Facebook Inc.
 An acquisition of AstraZeneca would add to the $127 billion of mergers among pharmaceutical companies this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 It’s a further sign that the Ludwigshafen, Germany-based company is increasingly embracing enzymes, building on its $62 million acquisition of San Diego-based Verenium Corp.
 Older Patients The acquisition of Gentiva would help Kindred serve elderly patients, with the number of people older than 65 expected to double to 21 percent of the US.
 Rocket Engines The Air Force’s top uniformed acquisition official said the service is spending about $60 million and using as many as 100 people to certify SpaceX for the launches.
 cable company, an alternate source of revenue even as it expands in pay-TV with the acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 and Canada, where the process could take upwards of a year” The acquisition of Vancouver-based Ainsworth, announced Sept.
 Part of the proceeds will go to its 715-million pound ($12 billion) acquisition of share rights left in family trusts by one of the company’s founders nearly a century ago, which simplifies its stock structure, spokeswoman Lucila Zambrano said.
 The new CEO’s moves include unloading the old jets from the 2011 acquisition of Webjet Linhas Aereas SA -- and the flights to the US, which were announced about four months after Kakinoff took the job.
 Son, who led SoftBank’s $22 billion acquisition of Sprint Corp.
 “Kakao Talk can connect to Daum’s searching engine on their platform and can lift their share in the online search market, while Daum can also use its advertisement tool to sell Kakao’s mobile advertisements” The deal follows Facebook Inc’s acquisition of messaging application WhatsApp Inc.
 Comcast’s pending acquisition of Time Warner Cable is partially what sparked the frenzy, and it will likely accelerate Dish’s timeframe for striking a deal of its own, Chaplin of New Street Research said.
 “Consumers in Brazil are more cautious now because inflation is still high and credit for the acquisition of goods has decreased,” Ricardo Pinto Nogueira, the head of operations at brokerage firm Souza Barros, said in a phone interview from Sao Paulo.
 Etisalat last month signed a 315 billion-euro ($44 billion) deal with 17 banks to fund the acquisition of the Maroc Telecom stake.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Shire Plc’s acquisition of Lumena Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The deal is the sixth since Ornskov’s appointment was announced in October 2012, including the $42 billion acquisition of ViroPharma Inc.
 is the latest corporation to consider reducing its tax bill by moving its legal address outside the US, proposing an acquisition of London-based AstraZeneca Plc that would let the company reincorporate in the UK.
 The subsidiary completed its acquisition of Nevada’s largest electric utility in December and announced a deal this week to buy SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink for about $29 billion to expand in electricity transmission in western Canada.
 Deutsche Bank AG led a $202 million first-lien loan this month to help finance Summit Partners’ acquisition of medical technology company Ability Network Inc.
 Goldman Sachs added the maker of fragrances and food flavorings to its conviction buy list, saying its acquisition of Diana Group will help accelerate earnings growth.
 Biggest Deal Buying Chicago-based Hillshire would be Tyson’s biggest deal, surpassing its 2001 acquisition of beef producer IBP Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The acquisition of Prisa’s 56 percent stake in Television Digital SA, or DTS, means Telefonica will hold 78 percent of the broadcaster.
 Under Bock, who has held the top job for three years, BASF’s largest acquisition was the $102 billion acquisition of seed-treatment supplier Becker Underwood Inc.
 Debt from the cement maker’s 2007 acquisition of Rinker Group Ltd.
 The acquisition of Hillshire, potentially the meatpacker’s largest takeover since 2009, would boost JBS’s debt levels to the highest in four years.
 AT&T is unloading the stake to help seal regulatory approval in Latin America for its $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV, the satellite-TV company that competes with America Movil for Brazilian and Colombian subscribers.
 The acquisition of San Francisco-based Redfern for an undisclosed sum provides Qinetiq’s fiber-sensing unit with technology that will hone monitoring of gas and petroleum wells following hydraulic fracturing, boosting their productivity, Chief Executive Officer Leo Quinn said in an interview.
 The deal follows Facebook Inc’s acquisition of messaging app WhatsApp Inc.
 It’s on track to complete its acquisition of GSW Immobilien AG this year, which will make it Germany’s second-largest apartment owner after Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE.
 Explaining the acquisition of the toymaker, Stuart said, according to a New York Times account, “The back of the cereal box on the breakfast table just seemed to be a logical fit between the cereal and toy businesses” Fisher-Price sales rose to $300 million in 1980 from $25 million in 1966, according to the Times.
 Securities and Exchange Commission forinsider trading ahead of Carlyle Group LP’s (CG) acquisition of theLong Island-based manufacturer of vitamins and nutritionalsupplements.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- TreeHouse Foods Inc, the maker of private-label foods for retailers, is weighing an acquisition of Flagstone Foods, people familiar with the matter said.
 2 spot among 401(k) providers with last month’s acquisition of JPMorgan Chase & Co’s recordkeeping business.
 Great-West’s acquisition of JPMorgan’s retirement business is scheduled to close in the third quarter of this year.
 and European markets business of Nasdaq, joined the exchange through the acquisition of Stockholm-based OMX AB, a purchase that was completed in 2008.
 Shunfeng is pushing to become a global clean-energy major with a spate of deals including its $480 million acquisition of Wuxi Suntech Power Co, once the largest panel maker, in April and parts of Sunways AG on May 2.
 Google’s $32 billion acquisition of smart-home startup Nest in February “ought to give utility officials a sinking feeling in the pit of their stomachs” since it makes clear the Technarians have begun to seriously eye at least the periphery of utility business if not its core, said Adrian Tuck, CEO of Tendril Networks Inc.
 companies from completing inversion deals through the acquisition of smaller companies in other countries.
 Siemens’s proposed acquisition of that division will probably entail swapping some of its rail assets for the French company’s energy division and creating two European leaders in their respective fields, people familiar with the matter have said.
 The company’s acquisition of video-advertising service provider AdapTV added to those costs, he said.
 It then started building its investment-banking franchise and cash equities business in 2010 as part of a global expansion following the acquisition of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s US.
May 19 (Bloomberg) -- Bayer AG is marketing a $142 billion loan backing its proposed acquisition of Merck & Co’s consumer business, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 That agreement, which is on track to close in the second half of this year, followed the acquisition of Varian Semiconductor Equipment Associates Inc.
 Berenberg Bank upgraded its recommendation on the UK’s biggest commercial broadcaster to hold from sell, citing its acquisition of a controlling stake in Leftfield Entertainment Group, and recent declines in the share price.
 mortgage insurer, raised $2585 million by selling shares below yesterday’s closing price to help pay for the acquisition of Clayton Holdings.
 The firm represented Rosneft, whose CEO Igor Sechin has been sanctioned by the US, in its acquisition of oil venture TNK-BP in 2012, though that work is now done.
 “It would be premature for us to speculate” on how the issue might be dealt with during an acquisition of AstraZeneca because “there is no firm offer or consummated deal,” said Joan Campion, a Pfizer spokeswoman, in an e-mail yesterday.
 Buffett told shareholders this month that his company is looking for a large takeover with 3G Capital, the buyout firm he teamed up with last year for the acquisition of ketchup maker HJ.
 Hewlett-Packard used technology from its 2010 acquisition of 3Par Inc.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Latam Airlines Group SA’s goal of bolstering profit is a bigger priority than restoring the investment-grade credit rating it lost after the $39 billion acquisition of Brazil’s Tam SA in 2012.
 The acquisition of eAccess would have resulted in “opportunity costs,” diverting cash from Yahoo Japan’s core competencies, wrote Maeda, who upgraded the company to an outperform rating from neutral.
 ITV has been expanding its US-production business with acquisitions in recent years of High Noon Entertainment, Thinkfactory Media and DiGa Vision, which produce shows such as “Cake Boss,” “Teen Wolf” and “Hatfields & McCoys” “The acquisition of the Leftfield Group represents a significant addition to ITV Studios as we continue to build our global content business over the long term,” ITV Chief Executive Officer Adam Crozier said in today’s statement.
 Sprint wants to pursue a deal while regulators are also reviewing Comcast Corp’s acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, with the hope that regulators will see both deals as changing the telecommunications industry, people familiar with the matter have said.
 BP signed its first accord with Rosneft since the Moscow-based company’s $55 billion acquisition of BP’s TNK-BP venture with a group of billionaires last year.
 Hillshire may have some appeal for Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, which has shown an affinity for brand names and food companies with its 2013 acquisition of HJ.
 Comcast’s proposed $452 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable in February, and subsequent deal with Charter Communications Inc.
 address through a $1056 billion acquisition of AstraZeneca Plc.
 In 2012, Cutler shifted the company’s domicile to Ireland through an acquisition of Cooper Industries Plc, a company run from Texas that had gained a foreign address through a 2002 inversion.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- JBS SA, the biggest meat producer, made an unsolicited $56 billion bid for Hillshire Brands Co, seeking to expand its sausage lineup and derail the company’s acquisition of Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 “We are coming forward now because the opportunity for your shareholders to obtain the compelling value represented by our proposal will no longer exist if the proposed acquisition of Pinnacle is consummated,” JBS’s Batista and Pilgrim’s CEO Bill Lovette said in a letter to Hillshire, a copy of which was included in today’s statement.
 JBS’s last large purchase was its acquisition of the Seara food-processing assets in Brazil from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais ($26 billion), announced in June of last year.
 In Germany, a successful acquisition of Fox’s stake in Sky Deutschland would force BSkyB to make a takeover offer for the remaining shares.
 agreed this week to a $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV, the biggest satellite-TV provider in the US.
 Yet unlike AT&T, Verizon has focused on smaller deals to expand its online-video capability, such as a January acquisition of Intel Corp’s OnCue service and an agreement to carry National Football League games on mobile devices.
 Snapchat is building its executive ranks and creating more features after turning down a $3 billion acquisition offer from Facebook last year.
 Such a transaction would enable Glencore to build on its acquisition of manganese assets from Vale SA.
 Nomura, whose global M&A business is led by Shinsuke Tsunoda, wasn’t involved in the largest deals in Japan in each of the past four years -- the latest being Suntory Holdings Ltd’s $159 billion acquisition of US.
 in 2011, SoftBank’s acquisition of Sprint Corp.
May 19 (Bloomberg) -- AT&T Inc’s acquisition of DirecTV also ends its investment in America Movil SAB, while building a stronger competitor to the mobile-phone provider that gave it access to the fast-growing Latin American market for more than two decades.
 Junk Rating Moody’s and Standard & Poor’s both rank SoftBank at their highest junk grade after cutting their evaluations of the Tokyo-based company last year following its acquisition of Sprint.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Matthew Teeple, a former analyst at a San Francisco-based hedge fund who was accused of taking part in a $27 million insider-trading scheme, admitted that he passed on a tip about Foundry Networks Inc’s acquisition of Brocade Communications Systems Inc.
 last year, is now eyeing an acquisition of T-Mobile US Inc.
 Unlike Comcast’s acquisition of Time Warner Cable, AT&T’s purchase of DirecTV would eliminate a choice for pay-TV customers in some markets because AT&T’s U-verse landline video service competes with DirecTV.
 “The acquisition of Rosemont fills HudBay’s long-term project pipeline and fits well with the company’s growth strategy” Opportunistically Timed Augusta, based in Vancouver, had rejected HudBay’s previous offer as too low and opportunistically timed, saying it expected permits to develop Rosemont would be issued soon and boost its shares.
 “A Covidien deal will allow Medtronic to rival Johnson & Johnson’s med-tech business in size and scale as the world’s largest medical device company” The purchase dwarfs Medtronic’s largest deal to date, the acquisition of Kyphon Inc.
 In February, Unibail closed the acquisition of a 50 percent stake in the Centro mall in Oberhausen for 535 million euros.
 The deal marks Merck’s first acquisition of size since it bought Schering-Plough Corp.
 in its 2012 acquisition of Inhibitex Inc, another hepatitis C drug developer, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 and the potential acquisition of Business Connexion Group Ltd.
 The law, which will probably be proposed in early 2015, would allow the state to intervene if a potential acquisition of a Dutch company is deemed to threaten parts of the national network, Kamp wrote in a letter to lawmakers yesterday.
 said its acquisition of DirecTV will help reduce one of its biggest video costs -- TV content -- by about 20 percent.
 raised $43 billion in its first-ever bond sale as the United Arab Emirates phone company seeks funds for its acquisition of Maroc Telecom.
 “The acquisition of Lumina is another step in First Quantum’s long-stated objective of geographical diversification,” First Quantum Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Philip Pascall said in the statement.
 TPG Capital and The Abraaj Group Ltd are seeking funding for the potential acquisition of Saudi fast food chain Kudu, Bloomberg News reported June 10.
 While Lafley was known for bold moves, such as his $57 billion acquisition of the Gillette Co, McDonald cultivated a more methodical, deliberative style.
 Kindler, who joined Morgan Stanley in 2006 after six years at JPMorgan Chase & Co, has been involved in some of the biggest deals, including the $129 billion merger of Continental Airlines with United Airlines in 2010 and 3G Capital Management’s $4 billion acquisition of fast food chain Burger King.
 Since going to court to block AT&T’s proposed acquisition of T-Mobile in 2011, regulators have insisted they want to preserve four competitors in the US.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Israel’s largest banks are finally getting into the technology startup game, and Google Inc’s acquisition of Waze Inc.
 It agreed to buy SeeWhy, a Boston-based maker of marketing software, on May 20 and earlier last month completed its acquisition of Fieldglass Inc, a maker of online human-resources software.
 is nearing an agreement on the price, capital structure and termination fee for an acquisition of T-Mobile US Inc.
 Applied Materials holds a special shareholders’ meeting to approve its acquisition of Tokyo Electron.
 Shire started building its rare disease business in 2005 with the $16 billion acquisition of Transkaryotic Therapies Inc.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable Group, the cable carrier that agreed in April to the $23 billion acquisition of mobile operator SFR, agreed to buy Virgin Mobile in France from Virgin Group Ltd.
 following the acquisition of its 193 stores in the country by Wal-Mart Stores Inc’s Asda in 2010.
 Actavis and Forest Labs will hold special shareholdermeetings to approve the former’s acquisition of the latterBlackRock holds its investor day, and annual meetings arescheduled for Krispy Kreme and Expedia, among others.
 offices but is domiciled in Dublin to tax reasons, and Medtronic Inc’s June 15 acquisition of Dublin-based Covidien Plc are among the most recent deals.
 Yandex will complete the acquisition of Autoru in the third quarter, the Amsterdam-based company said today.
 “A potential acquisition of Waertsilae has been a major overhang on the Rolls-Royce share price since January,” JP Morgan Cazenove analyst David Perry said in a note.
 Three weeks after lobbying lawmakers for the acquisition of Alstom SA’s energy assets, GE’s chief executive officer meets today with President Francois Hollande to win France’s backing and head off a Siemens AG-led counterproposal.
 “In addition, we expect the acquisition of Access Midstream Partners will fortify Williams’ stable, fee-based business model and support our industry-leading dividend growth strategy” Proxy Fight The deal was made four months after the company avoided a potential proxy fight by giving board seats to activist investors Keith Meister and Eric Mandelblatt, who had urged it to consider “strategic combinations” Williams proposed to exchange 085 Access units for each Williams Partners unit, according to the statement.
 TPG Capital and Abraaj Group are seeking funding for the potential acquisition of Saudi fast-food chain Kudu, Bloomberg News reported on June 10.
 SolarCity has become more vertically integrated in the past year, including its acquisition of Zep Solar Inc, a supplier of racking systems that make installation easier and reduce labor costs, said Shayle Kann, vice president of research at Boston-based GTM Research.
 over the acquisition of Getty Oil Co.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Bayer AG completed the syndication of a $142 billion loan backing the German drugmaker’s proposed acquisition of Merck & Co’s consumer care business.
 The acquisition of Hillshire, potentially JBS’s largest takeover since the acquisition of Bertin in 2009, would boost the company’s debt levels to at least the highest in four years.
 The company spent $750 million on a 2011 acquisition of Advanced BioHealing Inc.
 That amounts to its biggest deal since its 2001 acquisition of beef producer IBP Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 advised Facebook Inc, whose co-founder Mark Zuckerberg is a regular attendee, on its $16 billion acquisition of WhatsApp in February.
 The Swiss lender has advised Qatar’s sovereign wealth fund on high-profile deals including stake purchases in German automaker Porsche SE and the acquisition of London’s Harrods department store.
 Through its acquisition of DirecTV, AT&T is bulking up as Philadelphia-based Comcast Corp.
 (HPQ) has agreed tosettle investor lawsuits over its acquisition of Autonomy Corpthat led to an $88 billion writedown in 2012, a person familiarwith the matter said.
 “They know this and that they’ll have to train everyone to be service-oriented and professional” Yacht Club Marriott almost doubled its rooms in Africa to about 23,000 in April with the $200 million acquisition of Cape Town-based Protea Hospitality Holdings.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Two stockbrokers were charged with insider trading tied to International Business Machines Corp’s $12 billion acquisition of software company SPSS Inc, in a probe that has already yielded three guilty pleas.
 The regulator cited concern AGL’s acquisition of the New South Wales assets would cut competition.
 Barclays has advised on several consumer deals this year, including CVS Caremark Corp’s $21 billion acquisition of Coram LLC and Hearthside Food Solutions LLC’s $11 billion sale to Goldman Sachs Capital Partners and Vestar Capital Partners Inc, according to the memo.
 “We have consistently argued the acquisition of MacGen by AGL would not lead to a substantial lessening of competition and would bring public benefits to the people of New South Wales,” AGL Managing Director Michael Fraser said today in a statement.
 “It’s also the most intellectually interesting and disruptive” BlackRock, which burst into the $26 trillion ETF industry through its 2009 acquisition of Barclays Plc’s investment unit, is taking a different approach than competitors as it seeks to extend its dominance in the fastest-growing segment of the money-management business.
 At the time of BlackRock’s acquisition of the Barclays Global Investors in 2009, Wiedman was head of BlackRock’s corporate strategy and Fink tapped him, even before the deal was finished, to weave the unit into the larger firm.
 Under certain circumstances, Chicago-based Hillshire might also have to reimburse Tyson for $163 million for the termination of Hillshire’s planned acquisition of Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Chicago-based Hillshire, the maker of Jimmy Dean sausages, said yesterday that it’s not making any recommendation regarding either of the competing proposals, and it won’t withdraw its planned acquisition of Pinnacle Foods Inc, a condition of both the Tyson and Pilgrim’s offers earlier.
 “In addition, we expect the acquisition of Access Midstream Partners will fortify Williams’ stable, fee-based business model and support our industry-leading dividend growth strategy” Williams, based in Tulsa, rose 19 percent to $5597 a share at 9:53 am.
 borrowed $600 million to help finance the acquisition of Jos.
 Current investments include a stake in Addepar, a Mountain View, California-based financial-software firm, and the acquisition of a Midwest ambulance company set to close in the third quarter, George said.
 Abney led UPS’s 2001 acquisition of Fritz Cos, its largest purchase at that time, for $450 million in stock.
 A third of the cuts were among workers gained from its acquisition of a Renesas Electronics Corp.
 On June 9, American Energy announced its largest deal so far with the $425 billion acquisition of prospects in West Virginia, Ohio and Texas.
 Buying Hillshire would be Tyson’s biggest deal, surpassing its 2001 acquisition of beef producer IBP Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The acquisition of Suroco is scheduled to be concluded this month.
 “From a growth perspective, this transaction expands product offerings in our key end markets and allows us to address new opportunities” Chip Deals The deal is the third acquisition of a US.
 The wireless carrier is selling a total 21 billion euros of 10- and 20-year bonds as it seeks to finance its $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV.
 “However, Sberbank due to its acquisition of Volksbanken will become more of a key player in central and eastern Europe whereas VTB has a more global footprint, and I would expect also more activity in China” Solovyev said he expects more China deals this year after hiring bankers locally in 2013, including Xin Lin, the former head of global finance for Nomura International.
 Proceeds from the sale will be used to help fund its acquisition of 180 Boeing Co.
 “You have direct competitive overlap in an already concentrated industry” Ever since they went to court to block AT&T’s proposed acquisition of T-Mobile in 2011, regulators have insisted they want to preserve four competitors in the US.
 is marketing bonds in Europe a day after selling $2 billion of notes as it finances its proposed $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV.
 The deal is the largest leveraged loan in Europe this year, surpassing Patrick Drahi’s $64 billion of loans raised to back his acquisition of Vivendi SA’s French phone unit SFR, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 She also discussed Yahoo’s acquisition of Tumblr last year and rolled out new marketing products including sponsored posts on the blogging site.
 raised more than $42 billion in the region’s biggest ever corporate bond issue to fund its acquisition of Maroc Telecom.
 dropped 4 percent after people with knowledge of the matter said it is nearing a price agreement for a potential acquisition of T-Mobile US Inc.
June 21 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co’s planned acquisition of Alstom SA’s energy assets won approval from the French company’s board, moving Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey Immelt closer to capping GE’s biggest deal ever.
 Europe is stronger than it has been in a number of years, hardly robust but still at this point firmly positive” Africa Presence Marriott is boosting its presence in Africa and the Middle East on the back of the acquisition of Cape Town-based Protea Hospitality Holdings for about $200 million in April.
 The year’s biggest energy transaction was the $71 billion acquisition of RWE AG’s Dea oil and gas unit by AAR, an investment vehicle controlled by Russian billionaire Mikhail Fridman, which was advised by Deutsche Bank along with Morgan Stanley and Rothschild.
 to help finance the acquisition of Hong Kong Telecom.
 A bridge loan can be taken out quickly by a loan, bond or equity issuance” Thai retailer CP All Pcl signed an 819 billion baht ($25 billion) facility in March to help repay a bridge loan for its acquisition of Siam Makro Pcl last year, the country’s biggest ever takeover.
 with an acquisition of AstraZeneca Plc, US.
 “People have been surprised at how long it’s taken” Last Deal It’s been more than two years since Danaher last announced an acquisition of at least $500 million.
 must decide whether to accept France’s terms to complete the acquisition of Alstom SA’s energy assets, the US.
 No Recommendations Hillshire said today that it’s not making any recommendation regarding either of the competing proposals, and it won’t withdraw or alter its advice for the planned acquisition of Pinnacle Foods.
 After returning the automaker to profit and completing the acquisition of Chrysler Group LLC, Marchionne, 61, marked his first decade as CEO yesterday and is again at a turning point, with some investors skeptical over his plan to boost sales 61 percent to 7 million cars in 2018.
 The state-run bank provided financing for trading firm Marubeni Corp’s acquisition of Gavilon Holdings LLC and Mitsubishi Heavy’s joint venture with Vestas Wind System A/S.
June 14 (Bloomberg) -- Tata Steel Ltd, India’s biggest producer of the alloy, is in discussions with banks to raise a $3 billion loan for refinancing debt taken to fund the acquisition of Corus Group Plc in 2007.
 Berkshire’s acquisition of NV last year didn’t “seal the deal,” Elicegui said by telephone May 29.
 agreed to pay a record premium for a big health-care deal with its acquisition of Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 This latest Comex bid would be PPG’s largest deal since its acquisition of SigmaKalon Group BV of the Netherlands for about $3 billion in 2008, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 That’s the Paris-based company’s biggest deal since its $201 billion acquisition of Genzyme Corp.
 Corrigan stewarded deals such as EIG’s acquisition of a stake in gas pipeline Transportadora Brasileira Gasoduto Bolivia-Brasil SA.
 Bavaria, home to companies such as Linde AG, Siemens AG and Bayerische Motoren Werke AG, is reacting to Gazprom’s acquisition of sole control over German gas storage company Wingas GmbH this year in an asset swap with BASF SE’s Wintershall unit.
 “The acquisition of GE Capital’s business in the Scandinavian countries is an important step in Santander Consumer’s growth strategy,” Santander Chairman Emilio Botin said.
 Of those, more than 20 have been geared at specific industries, including the 2010 acquisition of clinical-trial software maker Phase Forward Inc, and purchases of retailer-software makers ProfitLogic Inc.
 “They haven’t really made a big acquisition in the last few years and they need more fuel in the tank” The acquisition of Micros would be Oracle’s largest since the $57 billion takeover of Sun Microsystems Inc, announced in 2009, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The Paris Marriott purchase includes a 226 million-euro purchase of the real estate and a 1185 million-euro acquisition of operating and holding companies, Kai Yuan said.
 OAO Megafon rallied 44 percent after signing a deal to pre pay $106 billion of a $118 billion debt related to its acquisition of data operator Scartel.
 Of those, more than 20 have been geared at specific industries, including the 2010 acquisition of clinical-trial software maker Phase Forward Inc, and purchases of retailer-software makers ProfitLogic Inc.
 In a sign animal spirits are returning, takeovers so far this year have totaled about $15 trillion, the most since 2007, led by Comcast Corp’s $68 billion acquisition of rival Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Among Protective’s largest purchases were a $11 billion deal last year for policies from Axa SA and the $12 billion acquisition of insurance units from JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Consumer groups have sought to block the acquisition of DirecTV, saying AT&T has failed to show that combining with the nation’s largest satellite-TV company wouldn’t harm competition.
 “You have direct competitive overlap in an already concentrated industry” Ever since they went to court to block AT&T’s proposed acquisition of T-Mobile in 2011, regulators have insisted they want to preserve four competitors in the wireless marketplace, where Sprint and T-Mobile are No.
 In its acquisition of Ono, Vodafone agreed to pay 105 times annual earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization.
 While that compares with an average of 211 times Ebitda among Stoxx 600 telecommunications operators, ratings companies say the acquisition of Ono risks pushing the ratio above thresholds deemed compatible with its existing credit score.
 The acquisition of Russell will help the London-based exchange diversify in the three core areas of capital formation, post-trade services and intellectual property, according to Rolet.
 ConAgra is struggling to digest last year’s acquisition of Ralcorp Holdings Inc, which sells private-label foods to supermarkets, drugstores and other retailers.
 Starwood Capital’s acquisition of TMI Hospitality’s properties for an undisclosed amount adds to the 103 select-service hotels Starwood and its investors already own.
 Blackstone’s $13 billion acquisition of hotel owner Apple REIT Six Inc.
 The restructuring casts doubt that an acquisition of the maker of Elizabeth Taylor and Britney Spears perfumes is imminent, Linda Bolton Weiser, an analyst at B.
 With the acquisition of Fusion, they get there faster,” said Srini Nandury, an analyst at Summit Research Partners LLC.
 Still, the move is a further shift in focus by Sanofi away from its home country since Viehbacher’s signature acquisition of Cambridge, Massachusetts-based Genzyme for $201 billion in 2011.
 The company, along with TPG Capital, is negotiating with banks to borrow about 700 million Saudi riyals ($187 million) to fund the potential acquisition of Saudi fast-food chain Kudu, three people with knowledge of the matter said this month.
 French officials led by Economy and Industry Minister Arnaud Montebourg have sought to block General Electric Co’s proposed $17 billion acquisition of the bulk of France’s Alstom SA, instead supporting a counteroffer from Germany’s Siemens AG.
 “We continue to want to expand through the acquisition of talent,” David Hunt, chief executive officer of Prudential Investment Management, said today at a presentation.
 The acquisition of Lumina for about C$470 million ($430 million) “comes as a surprise,” Ian Rossouw, an analyst at Barclays in London, wrote in a note.
 Buying Hillshire would be Tyson’s biggest deal, surpassing its 2001 acquisition of beef producer IBP Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The non-profit entity lowered its holding to 25 percent from 33 percent this year to reimburse debt that piled up in previous years as it borrowed to back Monte Paschi’s acquisition of Banca Antonveneta SpA in 2007.
 in its acquisition of Micros Systems Inc, which sells point-of-sale systems for hotels, restaurants and retailers.
 investor sued to block a proposed $26 billion acquisition of the company by Ventas Inc, the biggest health-care real estate investment trust, as it expands its ownership of medical offices and housing for the elderly.
 The acquisition of the biggest US.
 “It’s a sign that the board doesn’t want to make an acquisition of Avon less likely if one ever appears on the horizon,” he said in an interview.
 Micron completed the acquisition of bankrupt Japanese rival Elpida Memory Inc.
 The Rosneft loan due in December was part of a $31 billion financing package that the company borrowed for its acquisition of TNK-BP, finalized in 2013 and the largest-ever acquisition financing for a Russian company.
 Then, Comcast Corp’s $45 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, announced in mid-February, changed everything.
 Debt Repayment The company is raising money to repay part of a $4 billion loan that funded its purchase of Smithfield Foods Inc, the biggest Chinese acquisition of a US.
 “This figure simply bears no relation to a limited Countrywide program that lasted several months and ended before Bank of America’s acquisition of the company,” Lawrence Grayson, a spokesman for bank, said in an interview.
 This week, the company completed the acquisition of Oculus VR Inc, which makes a virtual-reality headset that Zuckerberg has said will be a major communication device after mobile phones.
 Eastern Europe To Hunter’s credit, he oversaw Molson Coors’s burgeoning Eastern European business following the 2012 acquisition of Staropramen maker StarBev LP, Yarbrough said.
 “The fundraising will be half in equity and half through asset-backed loans” Delta, which last week added a listing in South Africa to its primary one in Bermuda and is 25 percent owned by Johannesburg-based Delta Property Fund Ltd, owns a shopping mall in Morocco and is finalizing the acquisition of three office developments in Mozambique.
 The bank will allow as much as 50 percent of deposit requirements, or 30 billion reais, to be used on new loans and the acquisition of loan portfolios, according to a statement on its website today.
 “It will take something to ignite it and to get the interest back” Glencore Xstrata Plc’s $135 billion acquisition of Caracal Energy Inc, a driller in Chad, and Qatar’s Al Mirqab Capital SPC’s offer to buy Heritage Oil Plc for $15 billion along with some other deals in April and May encouraged some industry analysts, including Anish Kapadia from Tudor Pickering Holt & Co, to report investor interest in the European oil industry is reviving.
 The company was waiting to firm up its acquisition of Alstom SA’s energy assets before pursuing options including an outright sale of the appliances business, said one of the people, who asked not to be identified because the process is private.
 The Mountain View, California-based Web search company has announced at least 10 deals this year, including a $32 billion acquisition of thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Last year, the bank helped lead a $323 billion bond offering and arrange more than $4 billion loans for Valeant’s acquisition of Bausch & Lomb Holdings Inc.
 Weatherford bought drilling and oilfield service assets in Russia from TNK-BP in 2009 for $489 million before Rosneft’s acquisition of TNK-BP last year.
 AT&T can cancel its acquisition of DirecTV if the satellite carrier can’t renew its NFL Sunday Ticket contract, which allows customers to watch out-of-market football games.
 lost 33 percent after Chief Executive Officer John Chen said he doesn’t have any acquisition offers on his desk as he works to turn around the company.
 is about to learn how much it really paid for its 2008 acquisition of Countrywide Financial Corp: about $70 billion.
 TPG Capital and The Abraaj Group Ltd are seeking funding for the potential acquisition of Saudi fast food chain Kudu, Bloomberg News reported June 10.
 Twitter’s acquisition of San Francisco-based CardSpring is the first major move by Nathan Hubbard, the former president of Ticketmaster, who was hired last year to find ways to let people buy goods directly from tweets.
 The acquisition of Edinburgh-based Martin Currie, which will operate as a separate affiliate, is set to close in the fourth quarter.
 TPG Capital and Abraaj Group are seeking funding for the potential acquisition of Saudi fast-food chain Kudu, three people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 The company is putting the final touches to a $2 billion acquisition of David Jones Ltd.
 hired banks to raise the equivalent of $56 billion, the most since the acquisition of Corus Group Plc in 2007, to refinance debt taken to fund the purchase of Europe’s second-largest steelmaker.
 prosecutors were investigating Korenberg for insider trading involving Abbott Laboratories Inc’s acquisition of Advanced Medical Optics Inc.
 GE has been shedding real estate holdings and stakes in foreign banks while expanding the industrial business through moves including the almost $17 billion acquisition of Alstom SA’s energy assets.
 They included the $415 billion carve-out of Johnson & Johnson’s blood-diagnostics unit, announced in January, and the $193 billion acquisition of Tyco International Ltd’s fire and security business in South Korea, which Carlyle announced in March.
 This year’s $13 billion acquisition of most of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy assets is intended to allow Siemens to take advantage of the North American boom in shale gas extraction from hydraulic fracturing.
 As the only major phone carrier controlled by Brazilians, Oi’s attempts to use mergers to grow, such as the acquisition of Brasil Telecom SA in 2010, have long been backed by the government, leading Barclays Plc to once describe the company as the "national champion" “There’s only so much the government can do to maintain the national champion,” Walt Piecyk, a telecom and tech analyst at BTIG LLC, said by phone from New York.
 The software maker may also announce job cuts related to the acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s handset unit, people with knowledge of the matter have said.
 Delta’s Cash Delta, whose 2008 acquisition of Northwest Airlines marked the first tie-up among the biggest carriers, has led the way in handing back cash.
 A Sprint acquisition of T-Mobile, though, would probably be challenged by the Justice Department, which sued to block AT&T Inc’s plan to buy T-Mobile in 2011, First said.
 Since Newcrest’s acquisition of Lihir Gold Ltd.
 Following acquisition of the stake, Whirlpool will start a mandatory tender offer on all remaining shares of Indesit in accordance with Italian law at the highest price per share paid by Whirlpool under the purchase agreements, currently expected to be 11 euros a share.
 Looking Around “We have been actively looking at a wide range of opportunities, and the acquisition of this business is absolutely the right next strategic transaction for Mylan,” Executive Chairman Robert J.
 “The acquisition of Millennium Bank represents a further step to our expansion on the Romanian market and will strengthen our market presence, especially in the retail field” OTP, which has operations in nine countries in central and eastern Europe, is seeking to offset a profit erosion brought about by the deadly conflict between Ukraine and Russia, two core markets for the lender.
 KKR’s acquisition of KKR Financial, commonly known as KFN, in an all-stock deal, amounted to a controlling-shareholder buyout that didn’t provide enough to stockholders, Stuart Grant, a lawyer for KFN shareholders, told a judge today.
 That will fall further after Cosan completes its $3 billion, all-stock acquisition of ALL - America Latina Logistica, Latin America’s largest railroad operator.
 “It’s one of the things they should do now given we’re seeing consolidations arise in the aftermath of Telefonica’s acquisition of E-Plus” To counter a fall in revenue, phone and cable carriers across Europe are pursuing a series of mergers and acquisitions.
 Telefonica SA on July 2 got clearance for its 855 billion-euro ($116 billion) acquisition of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany, a regulatory decision that may provide impulse for a new round of deals.
 “The acquisition of MCL is an important step forward,” Chief Executive Officer Andrew Thomis said in the statement.
 Acquisition Potential Approval may lead to acquisition of Puma, Liang said.
 Wing Hang will become an OCBC subsidiary after the compulsory acquisition of the Hong Kong bank’s remaining shares, the lenders said yesterday.
 Gold production is forecast to increase to about 161 million ounces this year, higher than the previous estimate of 14 million ounces, because of the acquisition of the Cooke operations, Froneman said.
 after October’s acquisition of Skycig and plans to push into France, Germany and the Netherlands as early as this year.
 and Apple Inc’s acquisition of Beats Electronics LLC.
 1 global automaker, and an acquisition of that size would bring them to their target immediately,” said Juergen Pieper, an analyst at Bankhaus Metzler in Frankfurt.
 The company doesn’t plan to entertain an acquisition of the technology, he said.
 New Chief Former Kunlun Gas General Manager Zhao Yongqi was appointed as Kunlun Energy’s chief executive officer in December, a move that may help facilitate Kunlun Energy’s acquisition of the gas unit, according to UOB’s Shi.
 and KKR and TPG Capital’s acquisition of TXU Corp.
 This week, Nestle completed its 26 billion-euro ($35 billion) acquisition of a stake in Galderma to gain full control, and the $14 billion purchase of rights to Dysport and other drugs in North America from Valeant Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 HSBC opened the representative office in Tripoli in 2007, according to the Central Bank of Libya’s website, although its links to the country date back to its acquisition of The British Bank of the Middle East in 1959.
 The Phoenix-based company expanded into oil last year with its acquisition of Plains Exploration & Production Co.
 Investors this week accepted OCBC’s $5 billion bid for Wing Hang Bank Ltd, the biggest takeover of a Hong Kong lender since DBS’s $54 billion acquisition of Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 Telefonica SA last week got clearance for its 855 billion-euro ($116 billion) acquisition of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany, a regulatory decision that may provide impulse for a new round of mergers and acquisitions.
 Bush in 1990 in the proposed acquisition of MAMCO Manufacturing Inc, a maker of motors and generators based in Washington state, by China National Aero-Technology & Export Corp.
 The acquisition of Kentz is scheduled to close about three months earlier.
 BSkyB Acquisitions Today’s deal will give BSkyB cash to help finance its planned acquisition of pay-TV assets.
 AbbVie may follow a precedent set by medical device maker Medtronic, which made its acquisition of Covidien Plc contingent on no changes to US.
 Brazil Business “There hasn’t been any acquisition offer from Danone,” Kenichi Kobayashi, a spokesman for Tokyo-based Yakult, said by phone.
 in the most expensive major food acquisition of the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The forecasts don’t include any contribution from the acquisition of Fusion-io Inc, which SanDisk said it was buying for about $11 billion on June 16.
 Citic Pacific Ltd’s HK$53 billion share issuance for acquisition of its parent’s assets and Overseas-Chinese Banking Corp’s purchase of Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 The acquisition of Newsle will give Mountain View, California-based LinkedIn tools to provide its customers with better business knowledge, according to the company’s blog post.
 “Any issues regarding NBCUniversal programming and other video services, whether they be traditional or over the top are already amply covered by pre-existing FCC rules and deal conditions” Comcast had to agree to the conditions when the FCC and Justice Department approved its acquisition of NBCUniversal in 2011.
 Comcast already won approval for its acquisition of NBCUniversal from the Justice Department in 2011.
 The manufacturer said today it has no intention to sell its industrial gas-turbine unit following the planned acquisition of Alstom SA energy operations by General Electric Co.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Three mergers and acquisitions powerhouses -- Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP, Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz and Sullivan & Cromwell LLP -- worked on CIT Group Inc’s proposed $34 billion acquisition of OneWest Bank parent IMB Holdco LLC.
 “The acquisition of GlobalCollect would enable us to accelerate the implementation of our strategy across all channels, on a global scale, especially in payment services and mobile payment,” Ingenico Chief Executive Officer Philippe Lazare said in the statement.
 “The acquisition of GlobalCollect is a significant move to further expand the recurring services business,” Sebastien Sztabowicz, an analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux, said in a note.
July 8 (Bloomberg) -- Portugal Telecom SGPS SA’s acquisition of debt from a shareholder’s holding company is being criticized by Brazil’s state development bank, which said the deal lacks good corporate governance.
 Recent developments -- including theacquisition of the market’s biggest tenants-only brokerage,Studley Inc, by London-based Savills Plc (SVS) -- are signs thatSmith’s timing is right, he and his colleagues said.
 Volvo Deal Aerospace sales advanced to 11 billion pounds, spurred by the 2012 acquisition of aircraft-engine maker Volvo Aero for 633 million pounds.
 Germany’s Linde AG, which became the world’s biggest maker of industrial gases in 2012 with the acquisition of Lincare Holdings Inc, yesterday reported profit that missed estimates amid lower prices for medical gases in North America.
 Treasury Department financed its acquisition of old GM’s best assets.
 It also presents a challenge to Reynolds American Inc, which agreed to sell the popular Blu e-cig brand as part of its proposed acquisition of Lorillard Inc.
 Telefonica SA last week got clearance for its 855 billion-euro ($116 billion) acquisition of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany, a regulatory decision that may provide impulse for a new round of mergers and acquisitions.
 “The acquisition of Grindrod Bank will add scale to Bidvest’s financial services offering,” the Johannesburg-based company said in a statement.
 offices but is domiciled in Dublin for tax reasons, and Medtronic Inc’s $429 billion acquisition of Dublin-based Covidien Plc are among the most recent deals.
 and Apple Inc’s acquisition of Beats Electronics LLC.
 In 2013, a Chinese company’s acquisition of Smithfield Foods Inc, a pork producer, stirred congressional complaints about alleged threats to US.
 Newcrest shares fell 07 percent to close at A$1070 on July 25 and have declined 74 percent since the end of 2010, the year the producer completed its acquisition of Lihir.
 Deals Completed Among the deals completed in the quarter that Lazard advised on were Anheuser-Busch InBev NV’s $58 billion acquisition of South Korea’s Oriental Brewery Co.
 Its acquisition of Sparbanken Oeresund cut the ratio by 08 percentage point.
 The Hong Yuan purchase is the biggest takeover in mainland China’s financial industry, surpassing Ping An Insurance Group Co’s $43 billion acquisition of Shenzhen Development Bank Co.
 IPO Backlog Founder Securities Co, Credit Suisse Group AG’s Chinese partner for an investment banking joint venture, this month won approval from the China Securities Regulator Commission for its planned acquisition of smaller rival China Minzu Securities Co.
 They included the $415 billion carve-out of Johnson & Johnson’s blood-diagnostics unit, announced in January, and the $193 billion acquisition of Tyco International Ltd’s fire and security business in South Korea, which Carlyle announced in March.
July 28 (Bloomberg) -- Dollar Tree Inc, the discount variety store, obtained a debt commitment of $95 billion to finance the planned acquisition of Family Dollar Stores Inc.
 Its biggest purchase so far, the more than $15 billion acquisition of Argentina’s YPF SA in 1999, ended with the Argentine government’s seizure of a 51 percent stake in the company in 2012.
 North Sea Repsol previously considered an acquisition of Pacific Rubiales Energy Corp, Latin America’s largest non-state-owned oil producer, though it decided for the time being not to pursue a deal, people familiar with the matter said in March.
 Fee-paying assets under management fell 47 percent as the company completed its acquisition of KKR Financial Holdings LLC, moving the subsidiary’s assets to KKR’s balance sheet.
 have been snatched up by incumbents, Canada has blocked Telus’s proposed acquisition of Mobilicity three times, saying it won’t let the company take control of its smaller competitor’s spectrum, making that route unlikely.
 The second acquisition offer increases the chance that the Horizon deal won’t go ahead as planned, Adam Martin and Stuart Baker, analysts at Morgan Stanley in Melbourne, said today in a report.
 The acquisition of San Francisco-based Bizo, which was founded in 2008, is expected to close in the third quarter.
 The acquisition of the closely held company will give Lindt 79 percent of the North American chocolate market, according to Bloomberg Industries data, propelling it past Nestle SA.
 Job Cuts To counter, Allergan said July 21 it would cut 1,500 jobs and may use the savings for an acquisition of its own.
 Deals Completed Among the second-quarter deals that Lazard advised on were Anheuser-Busch InBev NV’s $58 billion acquisition of South Korea’s Oriental Brewery Co.
 during the Beijing-based company’s $151 billion acquisition of Calgary oil producer Nexen Inc, and counseled Melbourne-based BHP Billiton Ltd.
 Case Study Reynolds, who had been preparing a case study on Crumbs for one of his classes, said he began buying the chain’s stock after CNBC reported on July 10 that Lemonis, the chief executive officer of Camping World, was putting together an acquisition offer and financing.
 An acquisition of Mead Johnson would bolster the baby-food business of Danone, which competes with Nestle SA in that segment.
 The firm’s earnings were affected when Actavis Plc’s $218 billion acquisition of Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Dollar Tree’s acquisition of Family Dollar, announced yesterday, will create a discount chain with $18 billion in sales and more than 13,000 locations.
 10 crude producer to the world’s largest publicly traded oil company by output, aided by its acquisition of Yukos assets.
 Before that, Hewlett-Packard’s board fought lengthy internal battles over the acquisition of computer maker Compaq Computer Corp, culminating in the dismissal of Hurd’s predecessor, Carly Fiorina, in 2005.
 Vodafone’s acquisition of cable operators in Europe and falling revenue in some of its biggest markets contributed to the cut, Moody’s said.
 and opted to make an acquisition of its own.
 Verizon is still digesting its $130 billion acquisition of the 45 percent of Verizon Wireless that was owned by Vodafone Group Plc, a deal that closed in February.
 The Madrid-based company’s biggest purchase so far, the more than $15 billion acquisition of YPF SA in 1999, ended with the Argentine government’s seizure of a 51 percent stake in the company in 2012.
 Brazil’s state development bank yesterday criticized the Lisbon-based company’s acquisition of debt from a subsidiary of Grupo Espirito Santo, one of its largest shareholders.
 The base metals miner said it has been “actively pursuing” the acquisition of a mining project or operating mine.
 GIP manages about $187 billion and has led an acquisition of Gatwick Airport Ltd.
 with a lower corporate tax rate, often through the acquisition of a smaller company abroad.
 Philadelphia Mayor Michael Nutter in January signed an ordinance creating a land bank, easing the city’s acquisition of titles to be transferred to developers.
 The acquisition of Coventry Health Care Inc.
 Chen said BlackBerry has no acquisition offers on the table.
 Facebook also said in the filing that it may extend the date for the close of its $19 billion acquisition of messaging startup WhatsApp Inc.
 Lower income from reinsurance as rates deteriorate is being offset by the growth in Hiscox’s retail business, which includes its acquisition of DirectAsia, a consumer unit in Singapore, Hong Kong and Thailand, the chairman said.
 Valeant’s revised estimate was due to the loss of revenue from its sale of aesthetic dermatology products to Nestle SA on July 10, and a delayed close to the acquisition of PreCision Dermatology Inc, according to the company presentation.
 Allergan, based in Irvine, California, has repeatedly rejected Valeant’s acquisition offers, including the latest bid of $72 in cash and 083 of a Valeant share for each Allergan share.
July 9 (Bloomberg) -- A unit of Sinclair Broadcast Group Inc, the largest owner of TV stations in the US, is raising $105 billion in the junk-bond and loan markets to finance its acquisition of television stations owned by the Allbritton family.
 In 2013, a Chinese company’s acquisition of Smithfield Foods Inc, a pork producer, stirred congressional complaints about alleged threats to US.
 The deal isn’t contingent on the completion of Huntsman Corp’s planned acquisition of Rockwood’s titanium-dioxide business, Kissam told analysts on a conference call.
 Ballmer has made the legal ruling a condition of his acquisition of the team.
 Mitsubishi UFJ’s overseas loans surged 25 percent from a year earlier, buoyed by its $5 billion acquisition of Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya Pcl in December.
 The event is known for spawning deals, from cable operator Comcast Corp’s acquisition of film and TV company NBCUniversal to the agreement, announced after last year’s confab, for Amazoncom Inc.
 American Energy plans to use the debt it raised this week, in addition to $115 billion of equity from management and two partner firms, to pay for the acquisition of about 63,000 acres of leasehold in the Permian Basin from closely held Enduring Resources LLC.
 “We have made significant progress to completing our acquisition of NewPage,” Dave Paterson, chief executive officer, said in the statement.
 The bank purchased Coutts, which traces its roots to 1692, as part of its acquisition of National Westminster Bank in 2000.
 The software giant claimed, in a heavily redacted complaint filed today in Manhattan federal court, that Samsung is using Microsoft’s April acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s phone business as an excuse to stop complying with the contract.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Expedia Inc, the online travel-booking service, is planning a debt sale to help fund its proposed acquisition of Wotifcom, an Australian website.
 While the $117 billion acquisition of AstraZeneca would have made it possible for Pfizer to move to a lower tax jurisdiction and gain a robust pipeline, there are other possibilities.
 The record deal size represents a new wave of Israelistartups that are turning down strategic partnerships andacquisition offers to grow independently, said Adam Fisher, apartner in the Herzliya, Israel-based office of Bessemer VenturePartners.
 owner of the namesake banana label, is facing a proxy contest after the two companies whose proposed takeover was rejected urged investors to support their bid and scrap Chiquita’s acquisition of Fyffes Plc.
 The acquisition of Ireland’s Fyffes doesn’t provide “adequate value” compared with Cutrale Group and Safra Group’s $13-a-share joint offer, Cutrale and Safra said today in a preliminary proxy filing.
 The pending acquisition of Fyffes, proposed in March, would create the world’s largest banana company.
 In April, the French insurer completed the acquisition of a 51 percent stake in Colombian insurer Colpatria Seguros for 248 million euros.
 TPG Capital and Abraaj Group are seeking funding for their potential acquisition of Saudi fast-food chain Kudu, people familiar with the matter said in June.
 He denied Cervero had any responsibility in the acquisition of the refinery and that it was a decision of the company’s board.
 Part of African Bank’s troubles stem from its 92 billion rand acquisition of furniture retailer Ellerine Holdings Ltd.
 NQuants, founded within Lehman Brothers in 2000 by Durantel and Schneider, was sold to Barclays in 2008, following the acquisition of the defunct bank’s North American operations.
 “It’s only natural to look to a guy who’s run a big rental-car company and run it well if indeed a change needs to happen” Since its 2012 acquisition of Dollar Thrifty Automotive Group Inc.
 Its acquisition of Dollar Thrifty shrunk the number of major rental-car firms in the US.
 That’s the concern voiced by those who see the pending $425 billion acquisition of TWC by Comcast as having the potential to take those subscribers from the frying pan to the fire, and it’s why the deal could risk foundering.
 He joined the company in 2010 as part of its acquisition of London-based GLG Partners.
 last week turned away from a tax inversion strategy in its acquisition of Zug, Switzerland-based drugstore chain Alliance Boots GmbH.
 Onex made its first acquisition of the year in July with the $133 billion buyout of Parsippany, New Jersey-based insurance claims services provider York Risk Services Group Inc.
 The company last month completed its acquisition of restaurant-booking website OpenTable Inc.
 Enquest completed the acquisition of 50 percent of the Greater Kittiwake area of the North Sea this year.
 Britain’s biggest mortgage lender and its executives “knew or ought to have known that the acquisition of HBOS was not a good deal for shareholders of Lloyds and would not be in their best interests,” the investors said in legal documents from the UK.
 Telefonica SA on July 2 got clearance for its 855 billion-euro ($114 billion) acquisition of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany, a regulatory decision that may provide impetus for a new round of deals.
 That deal, which is on track to close in the second half of this year, follows the acquisition of Varian Semiconductor Equipment Associates Inc.
 “Our acquisition of Askfm was predicated on the belief that with the right mix of technology, talent and investment, we could make this site a materially safer place,” said Doug Leeds, chief executive officer of Askcom, in the statement.
 The $116 billion acquisition of Billiton came on the eve of a 10-year upsurge in commodities demand and gave BHP assets including aluminum, nickel and thermal coal.
 Rosneft is due to repay $12 billion by the end of the year, including loans to finance last year’s acquisition of competitor TNK-BP, according to the company’s website.
 The first-half profit of HK$234 billion ($302 million), reported yesterday in an exchange filing, came after a company controlled by the Guangzhou city government in southern China completed the acquisition of a majority stake in Chong Hing this year.
 Merck Gains Merck KGaA added 32 percent to 6437 euros after the drugmaker’s acquisition of AZ Electronic Materials SA helped second-quarter earnings beat estimates.
 The record deal size represents a new wave of Israeli startups that are turning down strategic partnerships and acquisition offers to grow independently, said Adam Fisher, a partner in the Herzliya, Israel-based office of Bessemer Venture Partners.
 The $116 billion acquisition of Billiton gave BHP assets including aluminum, nickel and thermal coal that no longer fit Mackenzie’s strategy of focusing on four main commodities.
 He outlined his plans for the next three years after a bid with German and Japanese partners for Alstom failed to derail General Electric Co’s $17 billion acquisition of the French company’s assets.
 Medline was named president of the Toronto-based company in November and has been a senior executive for more than 13 years, leading initiatives including the company’s acquisition of the Sport Chek retail chain in 2011.
 The $27 billion acquisition of US.
 is working to make a $1 billion business out of its marketing solutions product by 2017, propelled by its planned acquisition of Bizo Inc.
 “These recommendations do not change the fact that Valeant’s offer is grossly inadequate” Irvine, California-based Allergan has repeatedly rejected Valeant’s acquisition offers, including the latest bid of $72 in cash and 083 of a Valeant share for each Allergan share.
 Investors this week accepted OCBC’s $5 billion bid for Wing Hang Bank Ltd, the biggest takeover of a Hong Kong lender since DBS’s $54 billion acquisition of Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Emirates, the largest operator of Airbus Group NV A380 planes, finalized a $425 million syndicated loan with local banks for the acquisition of two of the double-decker aircraft.
 That deal, which is on track to close in the second half of this year, follows the acquisition of Varian Semiconductor Equipment Associates Inc.
 Part of African Bank’s troubles stemmed from its 92 billion-rand acquisition of furniture retailer Ellerine Holdings Ltd.
 completed its acquisition of Taylor Capital Group Inc, the holding company for Cole Taylor Bank, as is it expands operations in Chicago.
 Last month, the company hired banks to raise the equivalent of $56 billion, the most since the acquisition of Corus Group Plc in 2007, to refinance debt taken to fund the purchase of European steelmaker.
 They include Forrest’s May acquisition of Harvey Beef, Western Australia’s only licensed beef exporter to China, and Hancock’s purchase of a 50 percent share last month in two cattle stations, or ranches, in Western Australia’s West Kimberley.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, Southeast Asia’s second-largest lender by assets, plans to raise S$337 billion ($27 billion) by offering shares to existing holders after its acquisition of Hong Kong’s Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 Regulatory Risk Coca-Cola explored an acquisition of Monster in early 2012, a person familiar with the matter has said.
 Carlyle’s acquisition of Axalta was funded by the private-equity firm’s fifth US.
 Irvine, California-based Allergan has repeatedly rejected Valeant’s acquisition offers, including the latest bid of $72 a share in cash and 083 of a Valeant share for each Allergan share.
 and the acquisition of a stake in Banco Unico in Mozambique.
 “Our proposed acquisition of US.
 The acquisition of the Winston, Cool, Salem, Maverick and Blu brands will deliver a return on invested capital of 10 percent in the first full year following completion and will be “significantly” earnings enhancing, Imperial said in July.
 Growth in the support business was helped by the acquisition of Gibb Tools last year, and the purchase of Belfast-based port agent Michael F.
 Britain’s biggest mortgage lender and its executives “knew or ought to have known that the acquisition of HBOS was not a good deal for shareholders of Lloyds and would not be in their best interests,” the investors said in legal documents from the UK.
 Canada’s stance was only made more confusing after Ottawa then approved China’s Cnooc Ltd’s $151 billion acquisition of Canadian oil and gas company Nexen Inc.
 In addition to tapping Dish’s stockpile of wireless spectrum, SoftBank could use an acquisition of the pay-TV provider to develop a home broadband platform that would compete with products from Verizon Communications Inc.
 Ballmer officially completed his acquisition of the Los Angeles Clippers last week.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Kirkland & Ellis LLP, along with Freshfields Bruckhaus Deringer LLP, advised Infineon Technologies AG, Germany’s largest chipmaker, in its $3 billion acquisition of International Rectifier Corp.
 I don’t have any specific pressure from shareholders at this stage” Second-quarter sales rose 3 percent on an underlying basis to $115 billion and profit rose 6 percent to $255 million, helped by the acquisition of ArthroCare on May 29, Smith & Nephew said today.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable Group, France’s largest cable operator, said it gained subscribers and grew the average phone bill in the second quarter, as it moves to complete its $23 billion acquisition of mobile operator SFR by year-end.
 Profit from the Redmond, Washington-based company fell short of estimates in the fiscal fourth quarter, weighed down by the acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s handset unit.
 as it tries to complete its acquisition of Time Warner Cable.
 Regulators reviewing Comcast’s acquisition of Time Warner Cable have the power to limit the enlarged company’s ability to boost prices for sports programming.
 The company expanded in the country in 2011 with the acquisition of insurers Star and Edison from American International Group Inc.
 The deal is Hanergy’s fourth overseas acquisition of thin-film technology since 2012.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Wohnen AG, Germany’s second-largest publicly traded residential landlord, raised its profit forecast for this year after the acquisition of GSW Immobilien contributed to an 88 percent increase in first-half earnings.
 ConAgra has been struggling to digest last year’s acquisition of Ralcorp Holdings Inc, which created a hybrid company with both brand-name foods and private-label products.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Expedia Inc, the online travel-booking service, issued $500 million of debt to help fund its proposed acquisition of Wotifcom, an Australian website.
 By 1999, following the acquisition of a loan book and insurance operations and a spike in bad debts, the Theta group was renamed African Bank.
 Deals worth about $14 billion have been announced or completed so far this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, the highest annual total in three years and led by Agnico Eagle and Yamana’s $344 billion acquisition of Osisko Mining Corp, the industry’s biggest deal since 2010.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Permira Advisers LLP has approached Roberto Cavalli SpA about a possible acquisition of a stake in the Italian fashion house, two people familiar with the matter said.
 On the conference call, Dauman said Viacom’s acquisition of Channel 5 in the UK.
 Most of the rest comes from a wealth management company built around his $21 billion acquisition of Switzerland’s Bank Sarasin.
 Cutrale and Safra said their proposed acquisition of Chiquita is “without the execution risk and uncertainty inherent in” the Fyffes transaction.
 Henderson is gaining share in its biggest markets, and the acquisition of Geneva Capital will “extend our US.
 Part of African Bank’s troubles stemmed from the 92 billion-rand acquisition of furniture retailer Ellerine Holdings Ltd.
 The acquisition of Palo Alto, California-based Emu, whose corporate name is Tinker Square Inc, follows much larger deals in mobile messaging.
 AT&T has been expanding its online TV programming offering, while pressing ahead with the planned $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV.
 Chief Executive Officer David Pyott said last month that the company is seeking acquisitions and “has a lot of options” An Allergan acquisition of Salix, which has a market capitalization of about $10 billion, would force Valeant to borrow more money or offer more shares to make the deal happen.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Iliad SA thinks it can pull off an acquisition of T-Mobile US Inc.
 “The acquisition of Vestolit is in keeping with our strategy of becoming a global, vertically integrated chemical company with a focus on high-end, specialized products,” Antonio Carrillo, chief executive office of Mexichem, said in the statement.
 TPG Capital and The Abraaj Group Ltd are seeking funding for the potential acquisition of Saudi fast-food chain Kudu, people familiar with the matter said June 10.
 The Coca-Cola investment could be a precursor to an eventual acquisition of Keurig, Ali Dibadj, a New York-based analyst at Sanford C.
 and opted to make an acquisition of its own.
 Verizon is still digesting its $130 billion acquisition of the 45 percent of Verizon Wireless that was owned by Vodafone Group Plc, a deal that closed in February.
 “The acquisition of Schrader extends Sensata’s leadership position in pressure sensing and provides further access to a rapidly growing $2 billion low-pressure sensor market,” Sensata Chief Executive Officer Martha Sullivan said in the statement.
 He was referring to deals such as AT&T Inc’s planned acquisition of DirecTV and the proposed takeover of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The company is raising money to repay part of a $4 billion loan that funded its purchase of Smithfield Foods Inc, the biggest Chinese acquisition of a US.
 Rebuffing Facebook Snapchat, run by Chief Executive Officer Evan Spiegel, last year rebuffed a $3 billion acquisition offer from Facebook Inc.
 General Electric Co’s acquisition of Alstom SA’s power assets is expected to reinvigorate its offshore activities, according to Bloomberg Intelligence analyst James Evans.
 “We’re excited about that because the acquisition of Rolls-Royce gives us some fast-start aero-derivative technology which lends itself very nicely to these hybrid projects,” he said.
 were buying the company for 12 billion euros ($161 billion) was “not true” “The company has not reached a binding agreement or offer with relevant parties regarding the acquisition of Avolon and cannot guarantee the completion of the deal,” AVIC Capital said in the statement, adding that there were “bigger inaccuracies” in a previous report about the deal, without being more specific.
 Priceline completed on July 25 its acquisition of Internet restaurant reservation company OpenTable Inc.
 Young Management “Having founded the group with the initial acquisition of OEMK, and having built USM into one of the largest and most successful diversified international holding companies over the last two decades, I am convinced that through the combination of the group’s strong balance sheet and young and effective management, the prospects of USM for future growth are strong and exciting,” Usmanov said in the e-mailed statement.
 Coal Market The acquisition of Trayport will help CME boost European gas trading in the same way it did for its coal market, according to Fraenkel.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Merck KGaA’s second-quarter profit rose 23 percent as the acquisition of AZ Electronic Materials SA helped offset the effect of a stronger euro.
 “The transaction we announced this morning represents the largest acquisition of a quality, diversified health-care real estate portfolio in the past three years,” Jay Flaherty, who oversees NorthStar’s health-care property business, said on the conference call.
 Separately, Permira has also approached Roberto Cavalli SpA about a possible acquisition of a stake in the Italian fashion house, two people familiar with the matter said.
 “It’s a clean set of numbers and there’s a lot of confidence there” Cash Payout The cash return to shareholders -- Wesfarmers’ second in 12 months -- shows the dearth of investment opportunities seen by the company, which carried out Australia’s biggest takeover with its A$18 billion acquisition of Coles Group Ltd.
 The rules won’t deter drugmaker Pfizer Inc, which is exploring a possible acquisition of Actavis Plc and its Irish tax address, said a person with knowledge of the matter.
 “It’s hard to imagine an acquisition of Julius Baer this year, or for the foreseeable future” Julius Baer, Switzerland’s third-largest wealth manager, is a potential target for Credit Suisse, Inside Paradeplatz, a Swiss finance blog, reported on Aug.
 plans to use its agreed acquisition of Internet provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 The acquisition of Neotel, besides giving us fiber, capability and a customer base, it also has spectrum and that spectrum will give us some breathing space” Extra spectrum will help Vodacom cope with the growth in data, which grows 90 percent by volume a year in South Africa, and will speed up the expansion of its 4G network, he said.
 Restrictions for NBIM employees include a one-year lock-in period after acquisition of financial instruments, she said.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Eni SpA Chief Executive Officer Claudio Descalzi is under investigation for his role in the acquisition of an oil field in Nigeria for $11 billion.
 We will release our perspective on any potential impact on our pending acquisition of Covidien following our complete review” Kenric Tyghe, a Toronto-based analyst with Raymond James, said it’s unlikely the changes proposed in the US.
 He oversaw the company’s 2012 acquisition of Dollar Thrifty Automotive Group Inc, which shrank the number of major rental-car companies to three from four.
 hit another snag in its attempt to resolve a shareholder lawsuit over its botched acquisition of Autonomy Corp.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Telecom Italia SpA is evaluating a potential acquisition of Brazilian carrier Oi SA to challenge Telefonica SA in the largest phone market in Latin America, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 Coal India’s monopoly needs to endand state governments should be given some skin in the game tofacilitate and speed up acquisition of land above coal deposits,he said.
 We will release our perspective on any potential impact on our pending acquisition of Covidien following our complete review” Edward Kleinbard, a tax law professor at the University of Southern California, said in an e-mail that Treasury “has taken a very hard line on these transactions” He cited the government’s “very broad reading of its regulatory authority to address inversion deals involving accessing offshore cash” as well as “not grandfathering deals that are announced but not closed” Lew, who said in July that Treasury lacked authority to stem inversions, reversed himself in August and the administration began studying its options.
 secured more favorable terms for a proposed acquisition of rival banana producer Fyffes Plc as it tries to fend off an unsolicited takeover approach from a Brazilian group.
 During his tenure in that role, Yang spurned an acquisition offer from Microsoft Corp.
 Amazon, the giant Web retailer based in Seattle, has invested in robotics, including the deployment of machines in its warehouses based on technology from its 2012 acquisition of Kiva Systems Inc, as well as drone-based package delivery.
 Deals Fenwick & West, Jones Day, Paul Weiss Advise on SAP-Concur Deal Jones Day and Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison LLP represented SAP SE in its $83 billion acquisition of Concur Technologies Inc.
 Under the terms of the deal, SAP agreed to pay about 11 times Concur’s revenue from the past 12 months, making it the third-most expensive acquisition of a North American software maker valued at more than $1 billion in the past five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 regulatory claims that its brokerage unit failed to prevent an employee from trading on nonpublic information related to the 2010 acquisition of Burger King Holdings Inc.
 “This makes us proud and this makes us very confident” The company reiterated last month that its acquisition of AZ Electronic Materials SA, a chemical supplier to the electronics industry, will drive profit growth this year.
 Because at the end of the day, partners don’t need the couch” Deals Jones Day and Kirkland Advise on Eastman Chemical-Taminco Deal Jones Day represented Eastman Chemical Co, the world’s second-biggest producer of cigarette filter materials, in its acquisition of Taminco Corp, which makes chemicals used in water treatment and agriculture.
 He recently represented the Golden State Warriors in its acquisition of property to develop an arena in San Francisco, the firm said in a statement.
 The agreement represents further cooperation between Liberty Chairman John Malone and Comcast, who battled early this year over an acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 “It was an extremely active area in the early part of the 20th century” Landmark Hotel Jagdfeld will use the proceeds to pay off debt to HSH Nordbank AG, which financed his 1998 acquisition of the property and put it into administration in 2008, two people with knowledge of the matter said in November, when Jagdfeld’s plan to sell first became public.
 The 74-year-old Carlos Slim gets the majority of his $815 billion net worth from his telecommunications empire, started in 1990 with the acquisition of Telefonos de Mexico SAB in a government privatization.
 The Citigroup deal last week followed a smaller acquisition of 21 branches from the New York-based bank announced last year.
 He previously held various senior positions atSantander UK, formed through the acquisition of Britishlenders including Abbey National and Alliance & Leicester.
 The company borrowed more than $32 billion to fund the acquisition of the right to operate the highway for 75 years, a $150 million liquidity facility to fund early period interest payments and $665 million to fund capital expenditures through June 2015, according to Macquarie Atlas documents.
 Horizon is getting thenew address in connection with its $660 million acquisition ofIrish-incorporated Vidara Therapeutics International Ltd, theowner of a drug that treats two rare afflictions, chronicgranulomatous disease and malignant osteoporosis.
 After decades of operating in relative secrecy, the acquisition of physical assets is pushing independent commodity traders to increase disclosure as they seek new sources of financing, including bond sales.
 The country’s bank regulator said last year that it’sinvestigating transfers made to a Parex account by Stockholm-based telephone company TeliaSonera AB (TLSN) to help facilitate theacquisition of mobile network license in Uzbekistan.
 Points Program “Rakuten’s acquisition of Ebates is a positive instrategic terms,” Yoshitaka Nagao, an analyst at NomuraHoldings Inc, said in a report dated yesterday.
 Rio Tinto agreed in July to sell the assets, part of its $37 billion acquisition of Riversdale Mining Ltd.
 We don’t feel that we need to overpay to continue creating significant value for our stakeholders” Couche-Tard “did a great job with the acquisition of Statoil, and that’s an opportunity that might be in Asia, the exact same thing,” Kevin Headland, director of the portfolio strategy group at Manulife Asset Management, said in a Sept.
 This diversification smooths out our earnings and improves our risk profile” The largest purchase Botin made was the 125 billion-euro acquisition of Abbey National in the UK, a transaction that anchored the bank in Europe’s second-biggest economy after Germany and widened Santander’s profit base beyond Spain.
 Aecom Technology, the Los Angeles-based engineering firm,sold $16 billion of high-yield bonds to back its acquisition ofURS Corp.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Microsoft Corp’s potential acquisition of Mojang AB, the Swedish developer behind the Minecraft online game, could make the game’s 35-year-old creator Markus Persson a billionaire.
 jumped 39 percent after attracting an acquisition offer from Endo International Plc.
 The Australian bank’s co-investors in that fund have balked at the low-returns that a potential acquisition of Cleco offers, a result of its already high share price and low growth prospects, the people said.
 The deal follows Rakuten’s $900 million acquisition of Internet messaging and calling service Viber in March as Mikitani looks outside Japan for growth.
 “However, we view this as an extremely complex combination, which would require substantial disposals and where the executional and cultural challenges of merging these two companies would be immense” An offer for the world’s third-biggest brewer could rival the largest purchase of a beermaker ever -- InBev NV’s acquisition of Anheuser-Busch in 2008.
 Heineken traces its roots to the 1864 acquisition of a brewery by Gerard Adriaan Heineken.
 Last year, a Beijing-based university led the acquisition of Spreadtrum Communications Inc, a designer of chips used to connect smartphones to cellular networks.
 He oversaw the company’s 2012 acquisition of Dollar Thrifty, which shrank the number of major US.
 Telecom Italia SpA is evaluating a potential acquisition of Oi to challenge Telefonica SA in the largest phone market in Latin America, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 The acquisition of Windsor, which makes spring roll and pot-stickers, will take place in early November after the Texas-based company separates its sausage business, Ajinomoto said.
 politicians have also cited the 2010 acquisition of chocolate producer Cadbury Ltd.
 AT&T is still working to close its acquisition of satellite carrier DirecTV, which has operations in Latin America including a stake in Sky Mexico, the nation’s biggest TV provider.
 is firing 2,100 workers today, part of a plan announced in July to eliminate 18,000 jobs to streamline the workforce and integrate the acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s handset unit.
 “The acquisition of MBFC Tower 3 and the divestment of Prudential Tower will enhance and transform Keppel REIT’s portfolio in terms of age and quality of assets, as well as improve the portfolio property fundamentals,” Ng was quoted as saying in the statement.
 He oversaw the company’s 2012 acquisition of Dollar Thrifty Automotive Group Inc, which shrank the number of major rental-car companies to three from four.
 Banco Davivienda SA completed the $830 million acquisition of HSBC’s assets in Costa Rica, El Salvador and Honduras in 2012.
 hit another snag in its attempt toresolve a shareholder lawsuit over its botched acquisition ofAutonomy Corp.
 “We think that this is based on the June 2013 acquisition of EdgeSpring.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG sold $575 billion of bonds to fund its pending acquisition of biotechnology company InterMune Inc.
 For CenturyLink, this would be the second acquisition of a cloud-computing company in the past year.
 Caterpillar doesn’t breakout results for its division but said in July that it’s morethan doubled locomotive sales since the acquisition of EMD,which had 2009 revenue of $18 billion.
 26 that a deal with Salix would thwart an acquisition of Allergan by Valeant or others.
 (VOD) plans to use itsagreed acquisition of Internet provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 The acquisition of Neotel, besides giving us fiber,capability and a customer base, it also has spectrum and thatspectrum will give us some breathing space” Extra spectrum will help Vodacom cope with the growth indata, which grows 90 percent by volume a year in South Africa,and will speed up the expansion of its 4G network, he said.
 The acquisition of Gallatin Steel Co.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Heineken NV, the brewer of Amstel Light, said it spurned an acquisition offer from SABMiller Plc and plans to stay independent.
 An acquisition of Zantel would give a buyer access to spectrum in Tanzania, helping it cope with growing demand for mobile data.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Electrolux AB Chief Executive Officer Keith McLoughlin indicated that today’s $33 billion acquisition of General Electric Co’s appliances business may not be the end of the company’s spending as he steps up the battle with main rival Whirlpool Corp.
 from Tishman Speyer and Prudential Real Estate Investors, announced yesterday, and the acquisition of Foundry Square II by TIAA-CREF and Norway’s sovereign-wealth fund, the world’s largest.
 That wouldn’t have anything to do with the fact that, like Goldman Sachs itself, one of its investment bankers was on both sides of Kinder Morgan’s acquisition of El Paso Corp, would it? Steve Daniel had an undisclosed $340,000 personal investment, and Goldman Sachs had a $4 billion stake, in Kinder Morgan while both were selling El Paso advice on the deal.
 Though Kaeser has had his setbacks -- he failed to thwart General Electric’s acquisition of the gas turbine business of Alstom SA -- Dresser-Rand is his second $1 billion-plus deal this year.
 Financial Firepower The Dresser-Rand deal is Siemens’ biggest since Loescher’s acquisition of health-care diagnostics specialist Dade Behring in 2007.
Telefonica SA (TEF)’s German unit isselling 362 billion euros ($47 billion) in new stock to helpfinance the acquisition of E-Plus from Royal KPN NV and createthe largest wireless carrier by customers in the country.
 “The acquisition of Ambit Biosciences further builds ourpresence in oncology to ensure we are delivering on our goal ofproviding world class, innovative pharmaceuticals in core areasof unmet medical need,” Daiichi Sankyo President and ChiefExecutive Officer Joji Nakayama said in the statement.
 “There is no minimum acceptance to our offer and we look forward to completing the acquisition of Sky Italia and a majority of Sky Deutschland later this year” The deal with Fox would transform Isleworth, England-based BSkyB, which is 39 percent owned by Fox, into a European satellite and cable service with almost 20 million subscribers.
 America Movil’s assets would give AT&T another foothold in Latin America, as it works to close its acquisition of DirecTV.
 carrier divested its stake in the Mexico City-based company earlier this year to help gain regulatory approval for its acquisition of DirecTV.
 Carole Bellis, another partner in the firm, said in a statement that Leschensky has “more than 20 years of experience representing clients in the pharmaceutical and life sciences industry, with the majority of that time spent working with emerging, venture-backed companies” Leschensky previously served as senior counsel at Amgen Inc, which he joined through the acquisition of KAI Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Since its 2012 acquisition of Dollar Thrifty, Hertz has been unable to take advantage of the pricing power its consolidation wrought.
 “With the acquisition of these shares in oil and gas fields, we are continuing on our growth course in Norway and intensifying the cooperation with our partner Statoil,” said Kurt Bock, chief executive officer of BASF.
 Buffett, 84 and the world’s third-richest person, amassed his fortune through Berkshire’s acquisition of companies such as Dairy Queen and See’s Candies, and by taking leading stakes in others, such as Coca-Cola Co.
 Zenith Bank Plc, the second-biggest lender, provided 40 billion naira for the acquisition of two electricity distribution companies in Lagos.
 improved terms of loans backing the acquisition of Belgian window and door manufacturer Corialis Group after meeting investors and adding leverage covenants earlier this week.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- CEZ AS’s top executive plans to visit Slovakia to discuss cooperation and investment opportunities including a potential acquisition of Enel SpA’s Slovak unit Slovenske Elektrarne SA.
 (CMCSA)’s acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The timing of the succession reflects the start of a new five-year cycle for the retailer amid the recent acquisition of Mr Bricolage, France’s third-largest home-improvement chain, Cheshire said.
 airwaves auction set for November after the acquisition of Clearwire last year gave the company a large swath of 25-gigahertz spectrum.
 Beijing-based NQ Mobile is still evaluating the acquisition offer made in July by Bison Capital Holding Co, Tencent Tech, a technology news website owned by Tencent Holdings Ltd, reported yesterday, without saying how it obtained the information.
 Deals Faegre Baker and Proskauer Work on the General Mills-Annie’s Faegre Baker Daniels LLP represented General Mills Inc, the maker of Cheerios, Bisquick and Yoplait, in its $820 million acquisition of Annie’s Inc.
 Points Program “Rakuten’s acquisition of Ebates is a positive in strategic terms,” Yoshitaka Nagao, an analyst at Nomura Holdings Inc, said in a report dated yesterday.
 That makes it the third-most expensiveacquisition of a North American software maker valued at morethan $1 billion in the past five years, according to datacompiled by Bloomberg.
 “The question is whether you are pushing the line or crossing it” Perry Corp, the $109 billion hedge-fund firm founded by Richard Perry, in July 2009 settled a dispute with the SEC over its acquisition of a 99 percent stake in Mylan Inc.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Gtech SpA amended the terms of its $47 billion acquisition of International Game Technology, eliminating terms that let IGT investors choose all stock or all cash for their holdings.
Deutsche Bank AG (DBK) will underwrite asmuch as 7 billion euros ($9 billion) of loans for Germansoftware maker SAP SE’s acquisition of Concur Technologies Inc.
 The 2006 acquisition of Reebok for $38 billion hasn’t helped.
 18 are of such importance that they impose a special duty on the board to refrain from approving any significant, irreversible commitments by the company between now and then unless shareholders are offered the opportunity to vote on them” Pentwater Capital Management LP, Allergan’s 12th-biggest shareholder with a 13 percent stake, also said today that a deal with Salix “has the potential to impede an acquisition of Allergan by Valeant, Actavis, or others” and the board should engage with Valeant or another suitor before seeking an acquisition.
 While HBC Investment Services is the preferred buyer, Nigeria’s Fidelity Bank Plc is the “reserve bidder for the acquisition of the entire issued and fully paid up ordinary shares of Enterprise Bank,” the Asset Management Corp, or Amcon, said in a statement yesterday.
 No Strike Bank of America is also leading a $126 billion term loanfor Aecom Technology Corp’s $4 billion acquisition of URSCorp, with commitments due Sept.
 “The proposed acquisition of Bostik representsa new major milestone towards this ambition” Photographer: Fabrice Dimier/Bloomberg Thierry Le Henaff, Chief Executive Officer of Arkema SA.
 Oi said in August it had hired Banco BTG Pactual SA to act as a special purpose vehicle that can acquire assets on its behalf, “with the purpose of enabling a viable proposal for the acquisition of shares of Tim” To contact the reporter on this story: Patricia Laya in Mexico City at playa2@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: Sarah Rabil at srabil@bloombergnet Crayton Harrison, John Lear Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 The acquisition of Peugeot Motocycles would give Mumbai-based Mahindra, which began making scooters in 2008, access to western technology as it seeks to compete with Hero MotoCorp Ltd.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Two ex-stockbrokers accused of insider trading tied to International Business Machines Corp’s $12 billion acquisition of software company SPSS Inc.
 pays programmers like CBS and ESPN? It’s a question that is tripping up the path to approval for Comcast’s $452 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, and AT&T Inc’s $485 billion purchase of DirecTV.
 The company completed the acquisition of Societe Generale’s Asian wealth-management business earlier this month.
 At the same time, Tim is working with Banco Bradesco BBI SA to negotiate an acquisition of Oi, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Proceeds will help finance the $625 billion acquisition of coal and gas-fired generation assets from Duke Energy Corp.
 GT Advanced had mainly sold raw materials and equipment to the solar industry, and the acquisition of Crystal Systems Inc, a manufacturer of furnaces used to grow crystals, in 2010 put them into the sapphire-material business.
 His largest deal so far, the $29 billion acquisition of Xstrata in 2012, turned Glencore into the world’s fourth-largest mining group at the time.
 Bloomberg News reported in June last year that Vodafone was considering an eventual acquisition of Fastweb.
 Cutrale, a closely held fruit juice company controlled by Brazil’s Jose Luis Cutrale, has partnered with banks controlled by Joseph Safra, Brazil’s second-richest man, to challenge Chiquita’s planned acquisition of Fyffes Plc.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- A group led by New York-based attorney Joe Tacopina completed the acquisition of soccer’s Bologna, the second takeover of an Italian club by North American investors since 2011.
 KKR’s acquisition of KKR Financial, commonly known as KFN, in an all-stock deal, didn’t amount to a controlling-shareholder buyout that shortchanged investors, Delaware Chancery Court Judge Andre Bouchard ruled.
 “To our mind, it’s a confidential matter, so it was either taken or leaked out by someone who had access to the information” UGL said in a statement the payment was a routine non-compete clause as part of its acquisition of DTZ, a bankrupt real estate consultancy where Leung was a director, shortly before he took office in 2012.
 said it intends to use about $16 billion in external financing to buy Covidien, reaffirming its commitment to complete the acquisition of the drugmaker.
 “The only possible explanation for Oi to consider this option would in fact be the need to raise funds in order to go ahead with a possible acquisition of Tim,” Espirito Santo Investment Bank analysts led by Andrew Hogley said in a note.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- The numbers are in for Facebook Inc’s acquisition of mobile-messaging application WhatsApp Inc: The social network paid $22 billion for a startup that generated $102 million in revenue last year.
 Charlie Ergen, chairman of Dish Network Corp, contacted Deutsche Telekom to say he is interested in a future acquisition of T-Mobile after a November spectrum auction, people with knowledge of the matter said in early September.
 and Google Inc’s acquisition of Skybox Imaging for $500 million.
 “There’s a lot of technology overlap between the two companies” Microchip Technology, based in Chandler, Arizona, said in August it had held preliminary discussions about a possible acquisition of CSR.
 Some shareholders have also expressed their support for an acquisition of Salix by Allergan, one of the people said.
 Ergen, Dish’s chairman, recently contacted Deutsche Telekom to say he is interested in a future acquisition of T-Mobile, people with knowledge of the matter said in early September.
 “We saw tremendous volume trade in the exchanges, in a very cost-efficient way” BlackRock, which burst into the $26 trillion ETF industry through its 2009 acquisition of Barclays Plc’s investment unit, is positing that the funds buttress market stability at a time when regulators are increasing their scrutiny of money managers and the products they use.
 Shareholders of Charlotte, North Carolina-based Chiquita are scheduled to vote tomorrow on the acquisition of Irish competitor Fyffes Plc.
 16 rejected Cutrale-Safra’s $14 offer as “inadequate” The banana producer estimates its shares will be worth $1546 to $2001 following its acquisition of Fyffes.
 Microsoft claims Samsung is using Microsoft’s acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s phone business as an excuse to stop complying with the contract.
 Danone said today it’s purchasing 25 percent of Yashili International Holdings Ltd, which would sap financial resources from a potential acquisition of the Glenview, Illinois-based competitor.
 Vitol Group’s acquisition of refineries and petroleum storage in Australia and Africa from Royal Dutch Shell Plc highlights the trend, according to Oliver Wyman.
 The deal also helps DBS expand beyond the retail-banking operation in Hong Kong, which it built from a 2001 $54 billion acquisition of Dao Heng Bank Group Ltd.
 Noninterest expense of $704 million was higher than some analysts predicted and Chief Executive Officer Beth Mooney said its acquisition of Pacific Crest Securities LLC last month added to expenses.
 “The acquisition of Pacific Rubiales would generate growthfrom now through the next five years,” he said in a telephoneinterview.
 Russian prosecutors placed the billionaire under house arrest two weeks ago for alleged violations in the acquisition of shares in oil producer OAO Bashneft.
 on its 7 billion rand ($630 million) acquisition of Internet provider Neotel (Pty) Ltd.
 Tim, a unit of Telecom Italia SpA, is has retained Bradesco to negotiate an acquisition of Oi, according to people familiar with the matter.
 “The acquisition of CGE enables Gas Natural to gain immediate scale in Chile” Gas Natural rose 01 percent to 2181 euros in Madrid today.
 It also has offices in other buildings in the area, designed as a corporate campus in the early 2000s after Chase Manhattan Corp’s acquisition of JP.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- TDC A/S, Denmark’s biggest phone company, expects to sell bonds this quarter at a record-low coupon to raise money for its acquisition of a Norwegian cable provider, Chief Financial Officer Pernille Erenbjerg said.
 Rio de Janeiro-based Tim is working with Bradesco to negotiate an acquisition of Oi, people familiar with the matter told Bloomberg News last week.
 “The acquisition of Durata is a strong strategic fit that strengthens Actavis’s emerging infectious disease franchise and aligns with our stated goal to make smart, targeted investments,” said Actavis Chief Executive Officer Brent Saunders in the statement.
 In Cnooc’s e-mail, a Nexen contract analyst based in Uxbridge, UK, inquired about administration costs related to the acquisition of the 2D seismic data covering the so-called Barents Sea southeast and the seabed around the Arctic Jan Mayen island.
 “Autlan’s ability to produce more of its own electricity and trim costs has freed up capital for more investment options” Ebitda has surged this year on lower energy costs since the acquisition of Cia.
 Automation and Control Solutions led sales growth with a 88 percent gain, aided in part by last year’s acquisition of the hand-held computer company Intermec Inc.
 Chief Executive Officer Evan Spiegel last year turned down a $3 billion acquisition offer from Facebook Inc.
 Nokia Acquisition Microsoft claims Samsung is using its acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s phone business as an excuse to stop complying with the contract.
 It led to one high profile termination in October: AbbVie Inc’s planned $52 billion acquisition of Shire Plc.
 Nice Mix Clariant’s revamp included the acquisition of German catalyst-maker Sued-Chemie AG in 2011 and the shedding of less-profitable units making commodity chemicals for paper, leather and textiles.
 Televisa reported gains in its pay-TV segment after adding about 800,000 new video customers through its acquisition of cable operator Cablecom SA.
 “Either we stick here and refine our results, or we make a move,” he said of the acquisition of Sanitec.
 Valeant also boasts a tax rate of about 5 percent while Actavis, in its prospectus for the acquisition of Warner Chilcott, said it would lower its tax rate to 17 percent.
 The combined entity, Pimco Advisors LP, became publicly traded, a run that ended when Allianz SE completed its acquisition of the money manager in 2000.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- CJ Korea Express Co, the country’s biggest courier delivery company, is considering an acquisition of Neptune Orient Lines Ltd’s logistics business.
 His largest deal so far, the $29 billion acquisition of Xstrata in 2012, turned Glencore into the world’s fourth-largest mining group at the time.
 The company plans to grow both “organically and inorganically” The acquisition of MetroPCS Communications Inc.
 A fourth suitor could emerge in Charlie Ergen, chairman of Dish Network Corp, who contacted Deutsche Telekom to say he is interested in a future acquisition of T-Mobile, people with knowledge of the matter said in September.
 Because if District Court Judge David Carter blocks Pershing’s move, who’s going to try it again? In case you’re just catching up, Pershing’s move was the Trojan-horsy acquisition of almost a 10 percent stake in Allergan, then announcing they would be used to help Valeant take over Allergan.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Evonik Industries AG is exploring an acquisition of Dutch competitor Royal DSM NV as Germany’s second-biggest chemicals maker seeks a large European target, according to people familiar with the matter.
 While Evonik is exploring an acquisition of all of DSM, which has a market value of 9 billion euros, it is most interested in the nutrition division, which supplies ingredients for health supplements and personal-care products, and would also consider buying just part of the company, the people said.
 GE said it is working to enhance cybersecurity following its acquisition of Wurldtech this year.
 “NQ didn’t take the acquisition offer, that gives investors some confidence,” Zhang said.
 I am deeply sorry for what I did” Koum joined the board of Facebook earlier this month after the Menlo Park, California-based social network closed its acquisition of WhatsApp.
 He’s done six deals since his appointment was announced two years ago, including the acquisition of ViroPharma Inc, which brought in Cinryze, a drug for a rare swelling disease called hereditary angiodema.
 raised $43 billion in June, the biggest bond sale in the Middle East this year, to fund its acquisition of Maroc Telecom.
 The combined entity, Pimco Advisors LP, became publicly traded, a run which ended when Allianz SE completed its acquisition of the money manager in 2000.
 The proposed acquisition of the closely held owner of the Earthchild and Earthaddict brands will add a network of 43 stores to Truworths’ 600 outlets across South Africa, the Cape Town-based company said today in a statement.
 The biggest issue is a lawsuit with Johnson & Johnson over Boston Scientific’s acquisition of Guidant Corp.
 Nonetheless “margins have remained reasonably stable or improved in the past five years with the exception of Swedish Match AB” Credit Ratings Imperial and BAT will need to repair their balance sheets, Moody’s said, after they complete transactions related to the acquisition of Lorillard Inc.
 Under the leadership of Kim, 41, the bank was involved in deals including the $66 billion acquisition of Australia’s Queensland Motorways Ltd.
 $47 billion acquisition of Smithfield Foods Inc, the largest Chinese takeover of a US.
 (VFC): Shrs may rise 25% to $81 as acquisition of Timberland boosts rev.
 On a conference call, the CEO discussed Facebook’s $22 billion acquisition of mobile-messaging company WhatsApp Inc, as well as the purchase of virtual-reality goggles maker Oculus and the importance of getting more people onto the Web.
 Nadella is cutting costs after Microsoft completed its 544 billion euros ($733 billion) acquisition of Nokia’s mobile-phone operations, and is seeking to streamline operations elsewhere.
 completed its acquisition of mobile-message service WhatsApp for about $19 billion, and a person with knowledge of the matter last week said Yahoo! Inc.
 because it could benefit from a potential acquisition of SABMiller Plc by Anheuser-Busch InBev NV.
 and HD Supply Holdings Inc, and gained from Apple Inc’s $3 billion acquisition of headphones-maker Beats Electronics LLC, in which it held a minority stake.
 A transaction would not only unwind a beleaguered merger with Portugal Telecom SGPS SA -- the enlarged company’s CEO stepped down this month -- but also remove an obstacle for Oi to pursue an acquisition of local rival Tim Participacoes SA.
 Leever is making the third acquisition of a farm-products company as he builds a portfolio of specialty chemicals.
 “We disagree, and that’s why we asked the court to rule that Microsoft is not in breach” Microsoft claims Samsung is using Microsoft’s acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s phone business as an excuse to stop complying with the contract.
 Denny recently advised on tax issues in connection with HSBC Holdings Plc’s underwritten rights issue, Iberia’s merger with British Airways and Delta Air Lines Inc’s acquisition of a stake in Virgin Atlantic.
 “We want to get into a situation where it impacts us less and less” Ridinger has been streamlining Lonza’s manufacturing operations after the $13 billion acquisition of Arch Chemicals in 2011 added cosmetic ingredients and made the Swiss company the largest supplier of disinfectants for pools and spas.
 “We believe that, at some point -- perhaps years in the future -- Danone will pursue the acquisition of Mead Johnson,” said Andrew Wood, an analyst at Sanford C.
 A spinoff would let AOL reap benefits from its acquisition of TechCrunch while continuing its move beyond a collection of news and entertainment websites to a focus on online-advertising services and software.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s C$21 billion ($19 billion) acquisition of an oil-services company announced just as crude prices began to sink in June is creating a new headache for Chief Executive Officer Robert Card.
 “Part of the logic of our acquisition of Xstrata was to reintroduce capital discipline” Lowest Cost Iron ore has slumped 40 percent this year.
 Glencore spent $25 billion in 2012 and $166 billion last year, largely on mines inherited through the acquisition of Xstrata.
 Ergen, Dish’s chairman, recently contacted Deutsche Telekom to say he is interested in a future acquisition of T-Mobile, people with knowledge of the matter said in early September.
 With almost $90 billion in deals over the last 10 years, including the 2008 acquisition of the maker of Budweiser, no other beverage company spends like AB InBev does.
 A sale of its African assets would give Oi proceeds it can use to explore the acquisition of a local rival as the carrier contends with a debt load of 462 billion reais.
 The German company overtook Air Liquide last year to become the largest industrial gases company by revenue, helped by its 2012 acquisition of Lincare Holdings Inc.
 yesterday terminated its planned 32 billion-pound ($52 billion) acquisition of Shire Plc, saying the policy changes undermined the rationale for the purchase.
 abandoned its planned acquisition of the banking unit of freight operator Grindrod Ltd.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Hughes Hubbard & Reed LLP represented AMC Networks Inc, the cable-TV home of “Mad Men” and “The Walking Dead,” in its acquisition of a 499 percent stake in BBC America for $200 million.
 The Latin America operation contributed $152 million, up from $133 million a year earlier, fueled by the acquisition of Chilean pension-provider AFP Provida SA in September 2013.
 and AT&T Inc’s acquisition of DirecTV are the two largest US-based mergers and acquisitions this year, totaling more than $130 billion including debt.
 after Reynolds completes its acquisition of Lorillard Inc, subject to approval by regulators.
 Interim Steps Boeing’s proposed revised schedule won’t be presented to Pentagon acquisition officials until early next year, after an Air Force evaluation, according to Gulick.
 and today announced the acquisition of German restaurant-review website Restaurant-Kritik for an undisclosed amount.
 “With the acquisition of Frieda River now complete, any offer from GRAM would have to incorporate significant value for this asset” Copper Prices Recent declines in commodity prices may make buyers less willing to pay up for PanAust now, and Guangdong Rising’s 23 percent stake could deter other bidders, said Tom Sartor, a Brisbane-based analyst at Morgans Financial Ltd.
 The update, which also includes changes to the look and feel of the app, is the first to incorporate Google’s acquisition of Songza, which specializes in new ways of curating song selections.
 Aabar entered into similar transactions to finance the acquisition of Daimler AG shares in 2009.
 Oando concluded its $165 billion acquisition of ConocoPhillips’s Nigerian oil and gas assets in June following regulatory approval.
 The acquisition of a predominantly US.
 company says Samsung has stopped complying with the contract, using Microsoft’s acquisition of Nokia’s phone business as an excuse.
 They were dominated by the $29 billion acquisition of Xstrata Plc, where Glencore paid a 48 percent premium, the data shows.
 The 57-year-old’s biggest deal so far, the acquisition of Xstrata in 2012, made the company the world’s fourth-largest mining group at the time.
 Lower Leverage Proceeds from the offering of five- , eight- , and 10-year notes will help fund the acquisition of some assets from Duke Energy Corp.
 Less than two months earlier, AT&T had cut off its financial links to America Movil to help clear the way for the acquisition of DirecTV, a direct competitor to Slim’s company across Latin America.
 Excluding the effects of the acquisition of Brazil’s Banco Industrial & Comercial SA, bad loans would have been 999 billion yuan, it said.
 “The acquisition of Pacific Rubiales would generate growthfrom now through the next five years,” he said in a telephoneinterview.
 ISI Acquisition Evercore’s acquisition of International Strategy & Investment Group LLC will be completed in November, the company said in the statement.
 Weil said it was a “happy confluence” that Gross joined at the same time the firm announced the acquisition of VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 “With Bill’s arrival and the acquisition of VelocityShares, we have an opportunity to develop future products in the exchange-traded product space,” according to a presentation accompanying the earnings.
 Glencore’s acquisition of Xstrata Ltd.
 The firm’s assets under management rose 42 percent to 2407 billion pounds, boosted by the acquisition of Ignis Asset Management Ltd.
 No terms were disclosed for the acquisition of Exxon’s stake in Univation Technologies LLC, which is expected to close by the end of the year.
 29 that Valeant’s offer is “grossly inadequate” In its lawsuit, Allergan seeks to have Pershing Square’s acquisition of its shares voided because it was based on insider information.
 Actavis has held talks about a possible acquisition of Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd, and earlier was approached itself by Pfizer Inc, the US.
 Sistema completed its acquisition of the oil producer in 2009, when Medvedev was president, from companies controlled by the son of the former leader of Russia’s Bashkortostan region, where Bashneft is based.
 Job Hunt It was Carrabba who led Cliffs’ ill-fated expansion in Canada, adding the Bloom Lake mine in Quebec as part of the acquisition of Consolidated Thompson Iron Mines Ltd.
 again revised its proposal for settling a shareholder lawsuit over its botched acquisition of Autonomy Corp.
 Since AT&T’s acquisition of DirecTV was announced in May, the companies had expressed confidence that the deal with the NFL would be renewed.
 Walgreen’s unit, Walgreens Boots Alliance Inc, issued $8 billion of bonds yesterday to help finance the rest of its acquisition of Alliance Boots, the Swiss company that runs pharmacy and beauty stores in Europe.
 When AT&T announced the $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV in May, Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson said he talked to Slim first.
 Chenevert, 57, retired after a six-year tenure as CEO during which he led the $165 billion acquisition of Goodrich Corp.
 28, after announcing the acquisition of its energy intelligence software developer World Energy Solutions Inc.
 Onex did manage to make its first major acquisition of the year in July when it agreed to buy York Risk Services Group Inc, which provides risk management, insurance claims and managed-care services for $133 billion.
 Lemtrada was a key component of Sanofi’s $201 billion acquisition of Genzyme Corp.
 offered $14 billion for Norwegian salmon farmer Cermaq ASA earlier this year and German chemicals maker Evonik Industries AG explored an acquisition of Nutreco competitor Royal DSM NV, mostly because of the company’s nutrition division, Bloomberg reported two weeks ago.
 Evtushenkov is being investigated in a money-laundering case relating to his acquisition of the regional oil producer.
 The SEC has been scrutinizing the stock purchases,disclosures and acquisition offers since at least May, courtfilings show.
 “The acquisition of Duluth provides Antofagasta with a long-term option to develop a large polymetallic resource in a stable and proven mining region,” Antofagasta’s Chief Executive Officer Diego Hernandez said in the statement.
 market’s biggest discount from face value in 2014 to help fund its acquisition of Bally Technologies Inc.
 Without the $200 million funding, the acquisition of a 49 percent stake in Hodna Cement Co.
 Preparing Complaint Gordhan said PPC may be preparing a complaint against him related to an alleged corporate governance breach in the build up to the planned acquisition of Hodna Cement in Algeria.
 RCS, an owner of broker-dealers that sell Schorsch’s real estate investment products, called off the roughly $700 million acquisition of a unit of American Realty Capital Properties, or ARCP, after the seller reported intentionally concealed errors.
 “With the acquisition of Range, PrairieSky has consolidated a leading private oil and gas royalty company in Western Canada” said Andrew Phillips, PrairieSky chief executive officer.
 in its acquisition ofAlliance Boots GmbH, a deal in which Walgreen opted not topursue a tax inversion, a month after Durbin called the originalplan for the company to move to Switzerland a tax dodge.
 BRF also decided not to pursue a potential acquisition of French poultry company Doux, Diniz said.
 “They’re quite keen to expand further through acquisition of the biggest and most dominant centers” Unibail may buy or build malls in Germany’s seven largest cities, including Hamburg, Munich and Cologne, if it can find deals that match its criteria for size, customers and return on investment, Reinitzhuber said.
 T-Mobile Interest Ergen contacted Deutsche Telekom AG two months ago to say he was interested in a future acquisition of its T-Mobile US unit after a deal to merge T-Mobile with Sprint Corp.
 Steinhoff’s operations span three continents, with the 2011 acquisition of Conforama adding stores in France, Spain and Italy.
 “Azul had even mentioned it would cancel an acquisition of jets if the proposal didn’t change,” Galdi said in a phone interview from Sao Paulo.
 The Federal Reserve has delayed M&T Bank Corp’s acquisition of Hudson City Bancorp Inc, the biggest pending US.
 A former banker, Tanaka joined Kakakucom Inc’s board in 2002 after overseeing the acquisition of a large stake for his former employer.
 with the 2011 acquisition of Japanese life insurers Star and Edison from American International Group Inc.
 The unit completed its acquisition of Nevada’s largest electric utility in December.
 Its acquisition of Dollar Thrifty shrank the number of major rental-car firms in the US.
 With the acquisition of the solar farm about 60 miles (97 kilometers) north of Los Angeles, Dominion has 344 megawatts of solar generating capacity under development or in operation across six states, the Richmond, Virginia-based company said today in a separate statement.
 Chemlogics Contribution Revenue rose 79 percent to 26 billion euros, bolstered by the 2013 acquisition of Chemlogics, a producer of additives used in shale-oil drilling.
 drugstore group completes a $153 billion acquisition of the portion of Alliance Boots Holdings GmbH it doesn’t already own.
 Deutsche Wohnen completed its acquisition of Berlin-based landlord GSW Immobilien AG at the end of 2013, making it Germany’s second-largest apartment owner after Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE.
 “The acquisition of a good company could help us to reach the needed critical mass” in the Vifor Pharma division, which sells the Ferinject iron therapy, Chairman Etienne Jornod said in an interview.
 The acquisition of Milestone, including 168 helicopters valued at $28 billion, came after GE’s six-month courtship with the four-year-old firm.
 The New York-based slot-machine maker intends to sell $22 billion of eight-year notes and $700 million of seven-year securities to help fund its acquisition of Bally Technologies Inc, according to a company statement released yesterday.
 The broadband company may use the proceeds to help finance its acquisition of some of Comcast Corp’s cable subscribers.
 phone company announced the $25 billion acquisition of Grupo Iusacell SA, as it furthers its push into Mexico.
 The increase includes foreign exchange declines of $11 billion and $95 billion that was added through the acquisition of stock manager Martin Currie, completed Oct.
 AB InBev has made almost $90 billion in deals over the past 10 years, including the 2008 acquisition of Budweiser.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Candlebrook Properties LLC, a closely held company with about 5,000 apartments in the eastern US, is diversifying into student housing with the $230 million acquisition of five off-campus properties.
 Priceline has been spurring global growth by pushing into new regions and markets, helped by the acquisition of a minority stake in Ctripcom International Ltd, China’s largest travel website, and the purchase of restaurant-reservation service OpenTable Inc.
 “We now expect Allergan to more aggressively consider its alternatives including a possible friendly deal with another pharmaceutical company or an acquisition of its own,” Shibani Malhotra, an analyst at Sterne Agee & Leach Inc, said in a note to clients.
 Later, he advised the firm on its $20 billion acquisition of Mexican brewer Grupo Modelo in 2013.
 Pfizer Inc’s $64 billion acquisition of Pharmacia Corp.
 had asked the Federal Communications Commission to limit third-party access in its review of the $452 billion deal for Time Warner Cable, and AT&T Inc’s acquisition of satellite TV provider DirecTV.
 It follows the marine fuel trader’s acquisition of similar operations from Anadarko Petroleum Corp.
 Brightoil’s acquisition of Anadarko’s business included its 29 percent stake in the Bohai Bay block.
 The company also recognized 68 million rand of impairments relating to its acquisition of Deli Foods, a biscuit manufacturer in Africa’s largest economy, which it bought 2011.
 plans to raise $29 billion in a two-part bond sale to help finance its acquisition of Bally Technologies Inc, after syndication of a bridge loan floundered.
 Chenevert, 57, retired after a six-year tenure as CEOduring which he led the $165 billion acquisition of GoodrichCorp.
 Without the $200 million funding, the acquisition of a 49 percent stake in Hodna Cement Co.
 The purchase price is $165 million in cash, minus any debt not related to the acquisition of patents.
 With the acquisition of the 182-megawatt project in Carson County, Pattern now owns 11 wind farms with a total capacity of almost 15 gigawatts, including the adjacent 172-megawatt Panhandle 1 project bought earlier this year, according to a statement today.
 Solaris, developed by Sun Microsystems beginning in 1992, came over to Oracle after its 2011 acquisition of the company.
 “However, the FCA has expressed its disappointment at the breach and has reiterated the seriousness with which it views such breaches and its willingness to take action in appropriate circumstances” The FCA has approved BGC’s proposed acquisition of GFI, which has a UK-regulated unit, according to the statement.
 “The acquisition of Alliance Boots broadens Walgreen’s reach into the European region through its retail stores and wholesale operations,” credit analyst Mariola Borysiak said in S&P’s note.
 GE’s planned acquisition of Alstom SA’s energy assets may reduce margins and prices, she said, adding that prices slipped 4 percent in the 12 months through September and will continue to fall in fiscal 2015.
 The next move will likely be an acquisition of a third restaurant concept to energize one of the most sluggish growth rates in the North American restaurant industry.
 The brains behind IHOP’s 2007 acquisition of Applebee’s, Stewart has increased margins and improved profitability by transforming the two core brands into almost entirely franchisee-owned chains.
 “We now expect Allergan to more aggressively consider its alternatives including a possible friendly deal with another pharmaceutical company or an acquisition of its own,” Shibani Malhotra, an analyst at Sterne Agee & Leach Inc, said in a note to clients.
 Its acquisition of Dollar Thrifty shrank the number of major rental-car firms in the US.
 announced a $25 billion acquisition of mobile-phone company Grupo Iusacell SA earlier this month as President Enrique Pena Nieto encourages more competition and investment in Mexico.
 As part of its defense strategy, Telecom Italia is weighing a potential acquisition of Oi by Tim, people familiar with the matter said in September.
 20 in a range of $16 to $18 to fund the acquisition of companies from its majority owner, China National Chemical Corp.
 “They’re not under any pressure to sell, I think they’re just waiting for the right timing of the market” Adama said it will continue work to complete the acquisition of the Chinese companies and evaluate market conditions for a future listing, according to an e-mailed statement on Nov.
 Now, last year’s $22 billion acquisition of Sprint is pressuring billionaire Masayoshi Son’s goal to keep expanding SoftBank through deals around the world.
 Similar to Abraaj’s offer, Kellogg’s is subject to the acquisition of a minimum 51 percent of Bisco’s shares.
 Overseas loans at Mitsubishi UFJ surged 25 percent from a year earlier, buoyed by its $5 billion acquisition of Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya Pcl in December.
 Disney also said it completed principal photography and had an official title for its first “Star Wars” movie since the $4 billion acquisition of Lucasfilm Ltd.
 A spokesman for the company declined to comment on the acquisition of the shares.
 As part of its defense strategy, Telecom Italia is weighing a potential acquisition of Oi by Tim, people familiar with the matter said in September.
 As part of its defense strategy, Telecom Italia is weighing a potential acquisition of Oi, people familiar with the matter said in September.
 and the tax-free acquisition of Gillette Co.
 Later, he advised the firm on its $20 billion acquisition of Mexican brewer Grupo Modelo in 2013.
 Batelco completed the acquisition of Cable & Wireless Communications Plc’s Monaco and islands division last year.
 “Our acquisition of Iusacell is a direct result of the reforms put in place by President Pena Nieto to encourage more competition and more investment in Mexico,” AT&T Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson said in the statement.
 They include the $201 billion acquisition of Genzyme in 2011 and increased collaboration with Regeneron Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 It’s spending to expand its Spanish business with the $44 billion acquisition of Jazztel Plc.
 said that Vodafone Group Plc may be forced to pay more than 8 billion euros ($10 billion) in a dispute over its acquisition of Kabel Deutschland Holding AG.
 Sergio Marchionne, chief executive officer of Fiat Chrysler, completed the acquisition of the US.
 As part of its defense strategy, Telecom Italia is weighing an acquisition of Oi, people familiar with the matter said in September.
 Bouygues SA advanced 39 percent to 2997 euros after Altice SA’s chief executive officer said it would be open to discussing a deal to buy all of Bouygues Telecom after completing its acquisition of local mobile-phone company SFR.
 Dow cut the payment in February 2009 after sales plunged and as it struggled to complete the acquisition of Rohm & Haas Co.
 Cable & Wireless Communications Plc dropped 74 percent, the most since May 2012, after saying it will sell new shares to pay for its $185 billion acquisition of Columbus International Inc.
 CEZ’s potential acquisition of the Slovak assets may have a negative impact on CEZ’s debt rating, Fitch Ratings Ltd.
 Earnings were hurt by a $95 million increase in pretax interest expense related to the financing of its 2013 acquisition of Vanguard Health Systems and share repurchases.
 This is the second quarter Community Health has reported earnings since its $74 billion acquisition of Health Management Associates Inc, which was completed in January.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Kumar Mangalam Birla said he is open to buying overseas cement factories in a deal similar to his $58 billion acquisition of aluminum maker Novelis Inc.
 Sluggish economic growth in Brazil, Russia, India and China has aggravated those problems, according to Card, who led the acquisition of Kentz Corp.
 Simon cited the recent acquisition of a 109 percent interest in Santa Monica, California-based Macerich by an investor it didn’t name.
 When AT&T announced the $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV in May, Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson said he talked to Slim first.
 20 in a range of $16 to $18 to fund the acquisition of companies from its majority owner, China National Chemical Corp.
 “They’re not under any pressure to sell, I think they’re just waiting for the right timing of the market” Adama said it will continue work to complete the acquisition of the Chinese companies and evaluate market conditions for a future listing, according to an e-mailed statement on Nov.
 Similar to Kellogg’s offer, Abraaj’s is subject to the acquisition of a minimum 51 percent of Bisco’s shares.
 The split will unwind Symantec’s acquisition of data-storage maker Veritas Software Corp.
 The exception was the 2009 acquisition of Moto Goldmines Ltd.
 “We’re very close” The $2 billion acquisition of Oculus, completed in July, helped Facebook expand its platforms beyond smartphones and tablets.
 “Bank officials are confident about formalizing a future acquisition of a bank or loan portfolios that will add value to the bank” OeVAG’s Romanian business was the only part shunned by OAO Sberbank when the Russian bank bought OeVAG’s eastern European unit in 2012.
 Altice, which holds a stake in France’s largest cable provider Numericable Group, would be open to discussing a deal to buy all of Bouygues Telecom after completing its $23 billion acquisition of local mobile-phone company SFR from Vivendi SA on Nov.
 Growth Plan The acquisition of Cole was part of RCS’s growth plan, said Keven Lindemann, director of the real estate group at SNL Financial in Charlottesville, Virginia.
 The company, which is 60 percent-owned by a unit of China National Chemical Corp, planned to raise as much as $423 million today to fund the acquisition of companies from ChemChina, as its owner is known.
 The company said it will continue to work on completing the acquisition of ChemChina’s companies, and will evaluate market conditions for a future listing, according to the Adama press representative.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- India approved a 158 billion-rupee ($25 billion) purchase of artillery, the first acquisition of large-caliber guns since the 1980s as Prime Minister Narendra Modi seeks to modernize the armed forces.
 The Houston-based company plans to use proceeds from the bond sale to help pay for its acquisition of Kinder Morgan Energy Partners LP and El Paso Pipeline Partners LP, according to a company filing today.
 Obama’s comments likely added to investors’ concerns that there will be more concessions demanded around net neutrality for Comcast’s $452 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable to win regulatory approval, said Roy Behren, who owns shares of Time Warner Cable at Westchester Capital Funds.
 Proceeds from the bond sale will be used to fund the acquisition of Palo Alto, California-based Tibco by Vista, according to a Nov.
 Gontijo’s comment marks a shift in Oi’s stance since it said in August it was working with Banco BTG Pactual to study a possible acquisition of wireless carrier Tim.
 Tim hired Banco Bradesco SA to negotiate an acquisition of Oi, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 Microsoft claims Samsung is using the acquisition of Nokia Oyj’s phone business as an excuse to stop complying with the contract.
 The disclosure requirement also would apply to the FCC’s review of AT&T Inc’s acquisition of satellite TV provider DirecTV.
 A BT acquisition of O2 or EE, each valued at more than 9 billion pounds ($14 billion), would transform the “competitive dynamics in the country’s telecoms industry,” Erhan Gurses, an analyst at Bloomberg Intelligence, said, leaving BT with more than 20 million mobile customers to add to its 33 million subscribers for TV, home phone, broadband and wholesale.
 by Halliburton, and the $66 billion acquisition of Allergan Inc.
 “We have significant reservations about Hasbro exploring a potential acquisition of DreamWorks,” Handler, an analyst for Stamford, Connecticut-based MKM, wrote in a note to clients today.
 “In such a case, there would be another investment, and an acquisition of Mead Johnson can’t be excluded, it’s the most obvious target” Danone acquired the medical-nutrition unit through the 123 billion-euro purchase of Dutch baby-food maker Royal Numico NV in 2007.
 “The acquisition of Volksbank Romania is part of our bank’s growth and consolidation strategy,” said Horia Ciorcila, Banca Transilvania’s chairman, in a statement.
(Bloomberg) -- Russian billionaire Vladimir Evtushenkov was freed from house arrest as a probe of his acquisition of a regional oil company continues, according to his lawyer.
 Gross ETF In what Weil calls a “happy confluence” of events, Gross joined just as Janus announced the acquisition of VelocityShares, to expand in exchange-traded products, where industrywide assets have more than tripled to $19 trillion since 2008, according to the Investment Company Institute.
 Burger King completed its acquisition of Canadian coffee-shop chain Tim Hortons this month, becoming the world’s third-largest fast-food company and changing its name to Restaurant Brands International Inc.
 Telefonica will join Oi and Claro later, after its acquisition of Brazilian broadband provider GVT from Vivendi SA is approved by local regulators, the people said.
 It’s planning to take an Irish address early next year when it completes the acquisition of Dublin-based Covidien Plc.
 reduced the maturity on parts of a $135 billion junk bond offering financing its acquisition of Gentiva Health Services Inc.
(Bloomberg) -- Repsol SA is planning to sell as much as 5 billion euros ($63 billion) of hybrid bonds to fund its acquisition of Talisman Energy Inc.
 Facebook completed the $2 billion acquisition of Oculus in July, giving the virtual-reality business a hoard of cash to spend on expansion.
 Its acquisition of Dollar Thrifty shrank the number of major rental-car firms in the US.
 bankers to serve as financial advisers on the potential acquisition of the unidentified firm, Berk said in the complaint.
 Halliburton Inc’s pending $346 billion acquisition of Baker Hughes Inc, announced last month, was the beginning of what could be a series of mergers, Jankowski wrote in a Dec.
 drugstore chain’s shareholders vote on the proposed acquisition of Alliance Boots GmbH.
 “They will eventually be certified,” Air Force Lieutenant General Ellen Pawlikowski, the service’s top military acquisition officer, said of SpaceX in an interview, although she declined to predict whether approval will come in time for the contract this month to launch a payload for the National Reconnaissance Office.
 Google Inc’s2012 acquisition of Motorola Mobility for $125 billion included17,000 patents.
 Mock pointed to the acquisition of its real estate arm, Cadillac Fairview Corp.
 The casino operator said today it’s cooperating with Quebec authorities in a probe into trading activities in Amaya securities surrounding its acquisition of Oldford Group Ltd.
 Facebook’s acquisition of Instagram in 2012 for $1 billion has also been paying off: A Citigroup Inc.
 The proposals include 190 billion rupees for submarines, a 158 billion-rupee purchase of artillery -- the first acquisition of large-caliber guns since the 1980s -- and a 32 billion-rupee deal to buy 8,356 Spike anti-tank guided missiles and 321 launchers from Rafael Advanced Defense Systems Ltd.
 Imperial Tobacco owns 50 percent of Corporacion Habanos SA, a cigar-distribution joint venture with the Cuban government that it inherited with the acquisition of Altadis in 2008.
 “The acquisition of this vertically integrated operation allows Republic Services to establish a significant platform in the E&P waste sector,” Republic Chief Executive Officer Donald W.
 drugstore chain’sshareholders vote on the proposed acquisition of Alliance BootsGmbH.
 office landlord, has been selling assets from its 2007 acquisition of Equity Office Properties Trust as occupancies increase and rents recover from the real estate crash.
 Proceeds from the bond sale may be used to help finance the acquisition of Covidien and for general corporate purposes, Bloomberg data show.
 They also reject allegations that Josh Comstock, C&J’s chief executive, misled directors into believing the deal was an acquisition of Nabors’s fracking-services unit, rather than a buyout of C&J by its rival.
 Delaware Chancery Judge John Noble concluded that the merger amounted to a takeover by Nabors, and C&J’s directors mistakenly treated it as an acquisition of the rival company’s fracking-services unit.
 Delaware Supreme Court Chief Justice Leo Strine said at the hearing today that the deal presented Comstock with a great opportunity to “supersize his compensation package” By the time the deal was negotiated, C&J directors still believed the transaction amounted to an acquisition of Nabors’s fracking-services unit, investors’ lawyers argued.
 for $6 billion and Breitburn Energy Partners LP $3 billion acquisition of QR Energy LP, both announced in July, as well as three acquisitions in June together worth $425 billion by Aubrey McClendon’s American Energy Partners LP.
 Carlyle has also discussed a potential acquisition of a European real estate team with at least two investment firms, said another person, who requested anonymity because the conversations are private.
 Telefonica would join Oi and Claro later, after its acquisition of GVT is approved by local regulators, the people said.
 and DSV A/S have conducted certain discussions concerning DSV A/S’ potential acquisition of UTi Worldwide Inc,” the company said in a statement.
 Dropped Charges Investigators failed to prove Evtushenkov was guilty of money laundering during a probe of his acquisition of Bashneft and “have dropped charges related to that,” Putin said today at his annual press conference.
 and DSV A/S, the Nordic region’s biggest trucking company, ended takeover talks after news of a potential acquisition of the US.
 In 1997 he helped take BlackBerry public and the firm advised on some of Canada’s biggest deals, including Kinross Gold Corp’s C$71 billion acquisition of Red Back Mining Inc.
 Lawyers for a Florida pension fund argued that Comstock, who led the negotiations with Nabors, misled C&J board members about the nature of the deal, which he said involved an acquisition of Nabors’s fleet of trucks that service fracking operations.
 Today’s announcement didn’t mention AT&T Inc’s proposed $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV, announced in May.
 is awaiting regulatory approval for its $485 billion acquisition of DirecTV, and is using the purchase to expand its pay-TV, Internet and wireless service to Latin America.
 “We’re going to change the world because this is not the one that we want to live in” Facebook Deal The hacked e-mails confirmed that Snapchat rejected a more than $3 billion acquisition offer from Facebook last year, and showed that Zuckerberg blamed the startup for leaking the deal to the press to boost its fundraising efforts.
 Encana Corp’s $68 billion acquisition of Athlon Energy Inc.
 Facebook’s acquisition of Instagram in 2012 for $1 billion has also been paying off: A Citigroup Inc.
 Emerson announced in November it took a $508 million charge related to the acquisition of Chloride Group Plc, which the company purchased in 2010 and soon thereafter saw its sales of uninterruptible power supplies dragged down by a weak European economy.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- BT Group Plc is leaning toward an acquisition of UK.
 Interviews/Commentary Corporate Tax Rate Hinders Competition, McLernon Says Nancy McLernon, chief executive officer of the Organization for International Investment, talked about Burger King Worldwide Inc’s acquisition of Canadian coffee and doughnut chain Tim Hortons Inc, corporate tax inversions and the best direction for domestic tax policy.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Fibra Mty SAPI, Mexico’s first real estate investment trust focused on office space, raised 175 billion pesos ($120 million) in an initial public offering to pay for the acquisition of nine properties.
 “This transaction, similar to our recently announced acquisition of Standard Life’s Canadian operations, will significantly increase our retirement plans business” Under the reinsurance deal, New York Life will assume $7 billion of John Hancock’s liabilities on life policies, the US.
 The deposits under investigation were payments for the acquisition of an industrial plant and two distribution units in 2012, JBS said in a statement to regulators.
 The C$36 billion investment estimate for Pacific NorthWest LNG includes the terminal as well as drilling, the construction of a pipeline and the acquisition of a gas producer in 2012 to supply the project.
 The deposits under investigation were payments for the acquisition of an industrial plant and two distribution units in 2012, JBS said in a statement to regulators.
 The acquisition of Saputo, which operates a Quebec production facility and has more than 640 employees, is expected to generate annual sales of $112 million and adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, or Ebitda, of $133 million, Bimbo has said.
 Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE, the country’s largest owner of rental homes, would become the second-biggest property company on the European continent with the planned acquisition of Gagfah SA announced yesterday.
 Buying Spree Companies are set to buy about 15 billion euros of German apartments in 2014, including Deutsche Annington’s 39 billion-euro acquisition of Gagfah, almost matching the 2013 record of 158 billion euros, according to data compiled by Jones Lang LaSalle Inc.
 He said he would look at opportunities bigger than the $165 billion acquisition of Goodrich Corp.
 Should Onex complete the deal, it would be the company’s second in Europe this year following its acquisition of Swiss juice-carton maker SIG Combibloc Group AG last month.
 As part of its defense strategy, Telecom Italia is weighing an acquisition of Oi, people familiar with the matter said in September.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- BT Group Plc directors are meeting today to discuss the potential acquisition of a UK.
 While oil prices have plunged lately, Avolon President John Higgins said younger planes still offer an advantage, with reliability “a big part of the equation” The IPO comes after Avolon rebuffed an acquisition offer from a unit of Chinese planemaker Aviation Industry Corp.
 market after the $22 billion acquisition of Sprint Corp.
 “Cargill communicated to Nutreco that it remains interested in pursuing the acquisition of Nutreco and is looking into the potential of making an offer,” the Minneapolis-based company said in a statement.
 The company gained the drug with the acquisition of Premacure AB last year and expects trial results in the second half of 2015.
 “We’ve been patient waiting for this opportunity” Blackstone has been selling assets from its 2007 acquisition of Equity Office Properties Trust as occupancies increase and rents recover from the real estate crash.
 The Warsaw-based utility wants to invest as much as 50 billion zloty ($14 billion), including in acquisition of exploration and production assets, as it seeks to boost foreign output to about 50 million barrels of oil equivalent by 2022, according to a new strategy for 2014-2022.
 “When you combine declining commodities with geopolitical risks and turmoil, that would be a situation for probably a disproportionate amount of change” The current job cuts have nothing to do with the company’s $346 billion acquisition of Baker Hughes Inc.
 Oi is backing away from ambitions to become a trans-Atlantic phone carrier after announcing the acquisition of the Portuguese assets last year in a merger with Portugal Telecom.
 The year’s biggest deals were Patrizia Immobilien AG’s 1-billion-euro acquisition of the Leo I portfolio of offices in the state of Hesse, and the sale of Frankfurt’s Palais Quartier mall and hotel complex to Deutsche Bank AG’s wealth management unit, Jones Lang said.
 and SAP SE’s $74 billion acquisition of Concur Technologies Inc.
 Government regulators are examining Comcast Corp’s proposed acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, which would unite two of the largest cable operators in the country, while 21st Century Fox Inc.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Publicis Groupe SA, which cut its 2014 sales forecast following a failed merger with Omnicom Group Inc, said it will start to recover next year helped by the acquisition of US.
 A BT acquisition of O2 or EE, each valued at more than 9 billion pounds ($14 billion), would transform the “competitive dynamics in the country’s telecoms industry,” Erhan Gurses, an analyst at Bloomberg Intelligence, said, leaving BT with more than 20 million mobile customers to add to its 33 million subscribers for TV, home phone, broadband and wholesale.
 The offer, which is 16 percent higher than Gagfah’s previous close, beats Deutsche Wohnen AG’s acquisition of GSW Immobilien AG last year that valued GSW’s equity at 17 billion euros.
 regulators to set conditions for BT Group Plc’s proposed acquisition of EE for almost $20 billion to ensure the former phone monopoly won’t discriminate against rivals, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Tri Pointe Homes Inc, which sells in eight states after this year’s $28 billion acquisition of Weyerhaeuser Real Estate Co, is opening active-adult communities in Phoenix and northern Virginia in 2015.
